Nevada, session 83, SB243.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 481.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.015 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
as used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires,
“certificate of title” means the document issued by the Department
or a Class I authorized third party that identifies the legal owner of
a vehicle and contains the information required pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 482.245. The definition set forth in this
subsection does not apply to chapters 488 and 489 of NRS.
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 480 of NRS, NRS
484C.600 to 484C.640, inclusive, 486.363 to 486.375, inclusive,
and chapter 488 of NRS, as used in this title, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(a) “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(b) “Director” means the Director of the Department.
3. As used in this title:
(a) “Civil infraction” means a violation of any provision of
chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive, 486 or 490 of NRS that is not
punishable as a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor or felony.
(b) “Full legal name” means a natural person’s first name,
middle name and family name or last name, without the use of
initials or a nickname. The term includes a full legal name that has
been changed pursuant to the provisions of NRS 483.375 or
483.8605.
Sec. 2. NRS 481.048 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.048 1. The Director shall appoint, within the limits of
legislative appropriations, investigators for the Division of
Compliance Enforcement.
2. The duties of the investigators are to travel the State and:
(a) Act as investigators in the enforcement of the provisions of
chapters 482, 487 and 490 of NRS, NRS 108.265 to 108.367,
inclusive, and 108.440 to 108.500, inclusive, as those sections
-
*SB243*

– 4 –
pertain to motor vehicles, trailers, motorcycles, recreational vehicles
and semitrailers, as defined in chapter 482 of NRS, and off-highway
vehicles, as defined in NRS 490.060.
(b) Act as advisers to any business licensed by the Department
in connection with any problems arising under the provisions of
chapters 108, 482, 483, 487 and 490 of NRS.
(c) Advise and assist personnel of the Nevada Highway Patrol in
the enforcement of traffic laws and motor vehicle registration laws
as they pertain to any business licensed by the Department.
(d) Act as investigators in the enforcement of the provisions of
NRS 483.700 to 483.780, inclusive, relating to the licensing of
schools and instructors for training drivers.
(e) Act as investigators in the enforcement of the provisions of
sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this act relating to authorized third
parties, as defined in section 5 of this act.
(f) Exercise their police powers in the enforcement of the laws
of this State to prevent acts of fraud or other abuses in connection
with the provision of services offered to the public by the
Department.
[(f)] (g) Perform such other duties as may be imposed by the
Director.
Sec. 3. NRS 481.063 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.063 1. The Director may charge and collect reasonable
fees for official publications of the Department and from persons
making use of files and records of the Department or its various
divisions for a private purpose. All money so collected must be
deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the Motor Vehicle Fund.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [6,] 7, the
Director may release personal information, except a photograph,
from a file or record relating to the driver’s license, identification
card, or title or registration of a vehicle of a person if the requester
submits a written release from the person who holds a lien on the
vehicle, or an agent of that person, or the person about whom the
information is requested which is dated not more than 90 days
before the date of the request. The written release must be in a form
required by the Director.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and [4,] 5, the
Director shall not release to any person who is not a representative
of the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services or an officer, employee
or agent of a law enforcement agency, an agent of the public
defender’s office or an agency of a local government which collects
fines imposed for parking violations, who is not conducting an
investigation pursuant to NRS 253.0415 or 253.220, who is not
authorized to transact insurance pursuant to chapter 680A of NRS or
-
*SB243*

– 5 –
who is not licensed as a private investigator pursuant to chapter 648
of NRS and conducting an investigation of an insurance claim:
(a) A list which includes license plate numbers combined with
any other information in the records or files of the Department;
(b) The social security number of any person, if it is requested to
facilitate the solicitation of that person to purchase a product or
service; or
(c) The name, address, telephone number or any other
personally identifiable information if the information is requested by
the presentation of a license plate number.
 When such personally identifiable information is requested of a
law enforcement agency by the presentation of a license plate
number, the law enforcement agency shall conduct an investigation
regarding the person about whom information is being requested or,
as soon as practicable, provide the requester with the requested
information if the requester officially reports that the motor vehicle
bearing that license plate was used in a violation of NRS 205.240,
205.345, 205.380 or 205.445.
4. The Director may allow access by a Class I authorized
third party to those portions of the Department database or other
technology system required to perform the services which the
authorized third party is authorized to perform pursuant to section
8 of this act.
5. If a person is authorized to obtain [such] the personally
identifiable information described in subsection 3 pursuant to a
contract entered into with the Department and if such information is
requested for the purpose of an advisory notice relating to a motor
vehicle or the recall of a motor vehicle or for the purpose of
providing information concerning the history of a vehicle, the
Director may release:
(a) A list which includes license plate numbers combined with
any other information in the records or files of the Department; or
(b) The name, address, telephone number or any other
personally identifiable information if the information is requested by
the presentation of a license plate number.
[5.] 6. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2, [4, 6, 7]
5, 7, 8 and [11] 12 and NRS 483.294, 483.855 and 483.937, the
Director shall not release any personal information from a file or
record relating to a driver’s license, identification card, or title or
registration of a vehicle.
[6.] 7. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) and
subsections [8] 9 and [11,] 12, if a person or governmental entity
provides a description of the information requested and its proposed
use and signs an affidavit to that effect, the Director may release any
personal information, except a photograph, from a file or record
-
*SB243*

– 6 –
relating to a driver’s license, identification card, or title or
registration of a vehicle for use:
(a) By any governmental entity, including, but not limited to,
any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions,
or any person acting on behalf of a federal, state or local
governmental agency in carrying out its functions. The personal
information may include a photograph from a file or record relating
to a driver’s license, identification card, or title or registration of a
vehicle.
(b) In connection with any civil, criminal, administrative or
arbitration proceeding before any federal or state court, regulatory
body, board, commission or agency, including, but not limited to,
use for service of process, investigation in anticipation of litigation,
and execution or enforcement of judgments and orders, or pursuant
to an order of a federal or state court.
(c) In connection with matters relating to:
(1) The safety of drivers of motor vehicles;
(2) Safety and thefts of motor vehicles;
(3) Emissions from motor vehicles;
(4) Alterations of products related to motor vehicles;
(5) An advisory notice relating to a motor vehicle or the
recall of a motor vehicle;
(6) Monitoring the performance of motor vehicles;
(7) Parts or accessories of motor vehicles;
(8) Dealers of motor vehicles; or
(9) Removal of nonowner records from the original records
of motor vehicle manufacturers.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
482.2175, by any insurer, self-insurer or organization that provides
assistance or support to an insurer or self-insurer or its agents,
employees or contractors, in connection with activities relating to
the rating, underwriting or investigation of claims or the prevention
of fraud.
(e) In providing notice to the owners of vehicles that have been
towed, repossessed or impounded.
(f) By an employer or its agent or insurer to obtain or verify
information relating to a holder of a commercial driver’s license
who is employed by or has applied for employment with the
employer.
(g) By a private investigator, private patrol officer or security
consultant who is licensed pursuant to chapter 648 of NRS, for any
use permitted pursuant to this section.
(h) By a reporter or editorial employee who is employed by or
affiliated with any newspaper, press association or commercially
operated, federally licensed radio or television station for a
-
*SB243*

– 7 –
journalistic purpose. The Department may not make any inquiries
regarding the use of or reason for the information requested other
than whether the information will be used for a journalistic purpose.
(i) In connection with an investigation conducted pursuant to
NRS 253.0415 or 253.220.
(j) In activities relating to research and the production of
statistical reports, if the personal information will not be published
or otherwise redisclosed, or used to contact any person.
[7.] 8. Upon the request of a court or its traffic violations
bureau, the Director shall release the mailing address and contact
information of a person who has been issued a traffic citation that is
filed with the court or traffic violations bureau from a file or record
relating to the driver’s license of the person or the title or
registration of the person’s vehicle for the purpose of enabling the
court or traffic violations bureau to provide notifications concerning
the traffic citation to the person.
[8.] 9. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (j) of
subsection [6,] 7, the Director shall not provide personal information
to individuals or companies for the purpose of marketing extended
vehicle warranties, and a person who requests and receives personal
information may sell or disclose that information only for a use
permitted pursuant to subsection [6.] 7. Such a person shall keep and
maintain for 5 years a record of:
(a) Each person to whom the information is provided; and
(b) The purpose for which that person will use the information.
 The record must be made available for examination by the
Department at all reasonable times upon request.
[9.] 10. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
Director may deny any use of the files and records if the Director
reasonably believes that the information taken may be used for an
unwarranted invasion of a particular person’s privacy.
[10.] 11. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 485.316, the
Director shall not allow any person to make use of information
retrieved from the system created pursuant to NRS 485.313 for a
private purpose and shall not in any other way release any
information retrieved from that system.
[11.] 12. The Director shall not release any personal
information from a file or record relating to a license, identification
card or title or registration of a vehicle to any person or to any
federal, state or local governmental entity for any purpose relating to
the enforcement of immigration laws unless the requester submits a
written release from the person about whom the information is
requested or the Director releases the personal information pursuant
to a lawful order, subpoena or warrant issued by a court of
competent jurisdiction. If the Director releases personal information
-
*SB243*

– 8 –
pursuant to this subsection in response to an order, subpoena or
warrant, the Director shall not release personal information beyond
what is specifically required to comply with the order, subpoena or
warrant.
[12.] 13. The Director shall adopt such regulations as the
Director deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
In addition, the Director shall, by regulation, establish a procedure
whereby a person who is requesting personal information may
establish an account with the Department to facilitate the person’s
ability to request information electronically or by written request if
the person has submitted to the Department proof of employment or
licensure, as applicable, and a signed and notarized affidavit
acknowledging that the person:
(a) Has read and fully understands the current laws and
regulations regarding the manner in which information from the
Department’s files and records may be obtained and the limited uses
which are permitted;
(b) Understands that any sale or disclosure of information so
obtained must be in accordance with the provisions of this section;
(c) Understands that a record will be maintained by the
Department of any information he or she requests; and
(d) Understands that a violation of the provisions of this section
is a criminal offense.
[13.] 14. It is unlawful for any person to:
(a) Make a false representation to obtain any information from
the files or records of the Department.
(b) Knowingly obtain or disclose any information from the files
or records of the Department for any use not permitted by the
provisions of this chapter.
[14.] 15. As used in this section:
(a) “Personal information” means information that reveals the
identity of a person, including, without limitation, his or her
photograph, social security number, individual taxpayer
identification number, driver’s license number, identification card
number, name, address, telephone number or information regarding
a medical condition or disability. The term does not include the zip
code of a person when separate from his or her full address,
information regarding vehicular crashes or driving violations in
which he or she has been involved or other information otherwise
affecting his or her status as a driver.
(b) “Vehicle” includes, without limitation, an off-highway
vehicle as defined in NRS 490.060.
-
*SB243*

– 9 –
Sec. 4. Chapter 482 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 5. “Authorized third party” includes:
1. A Class I authorized third party.
2. A Class II authorized third party.
Sec. 6. “Class I authorized third party” means a person who,
for compensation, performs the services listed in section 9 of this
act, including, without limitation, the issuance at his or her
physical place of business the items listed in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of section 9 of this act.
Sec. 7. “Class II authorized third party” means a person
who, for compensation, performs the services listed in section 9 of
this act, except the person does not issue at his or her place
of business the items listed in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
section 9 of this act and instead obtains those items on behalf of a
customer only by visiting an office of the Department or a physical
place of business operated by a Class I authorized third party.
Sec. 8. 1. The Department shall provide a Class I
authorized third party:
(a) Access to those portions of the Department database or
other technology systems required to perform the services which a
Class I authorized third party is authorized to perform pursuant to
section 9 of this act.
(b) Access to training for the Class I authorized third party
and his or her employees on those policies and procedures of the
Department that are relevant to providing the services authorized
in section 9 of this act, including, without limitation, training
regarding accessing portions of the Department database or other
technology systems pursuant to paragraph (a). As part of the
training the Department shall provide the Class I authorized third
party a written summary of the rights and responsibilities of the
Class I authorized third party, including, without limitation, those
rights and responsibilities related to bulk appointments. The
Department may charge the Class I authorized third party a
reasonable fee for such training.
(c) Notice of any regulations, policies or procedures and any
amendments to such regulations, policies or procedures
concerning authorized third parties or the services which an
authorized third party is authorized to provide pursuant to section
9 of this act not less than 30 days before such regulations, policies,
procedures or amendments become effective.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the ability
to purchase from the Department bulk amounts of:
(1) Certificates of registration;
-
*SB243*

– 10 –
(2) Certificates of title;
(3) License plates, including special license places, but not
personalized prestige license plates issued pursuant to
NRS 482.3667;
(4) Decals;
(5) Permits; and
(6) Forms related to the services that a Class I authorized
third party is authorized to provide pursuant to section 9 of this
act.
2. The Department shall provide a Class II authorized third
party:
(a) Access to appointments, including, without limitation, bulk
appointments, through any electronic or digital system in use by
the Department that allows a customer to make an appointment
for services at an office of the Department.
(b) Access to the standing appointment window and the
standby window at an office of the Department.
(c) A written summary of:
(1) Any policies and procedures of the Department that are
relevant to providing the services authorized in section 9 of this
act;
(2) The rights and responsibilities of the Class II authorized
third party, including, without limitation, those rights and
responsibilities related to bulk appointments.
3. The services authorized in section 9 of this act may be
provided:
(a) By a Class I authorized third party:
(1) By visiting an office of the Department or the Internet
website of the Department on behalf of a customer; or
(2) At a physical location operated by the Class I authorized
third party.
(b) By a Class II authorized third party:
(1) By visiting an office of the Department or the Internet
website of the Department on behalf of a customer; or
(2) By visiting a physical location operated by a Class I
authorized third party on behalf of a customer.
4. An authorized third party may operate an Internet website
or application to provide information to or accept information or
direction from a customer.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Bulk appointments” means a series of two or more
consecutive appointments on the same day at an office of the
Department.
(b) “Standing appointment window” and “standby window”
mean windows at each office of the Department located in an
-
*SB243*

– 11 –
incorporated city whose population is 500,000 or more for use by
an authorized third party.
Sec. 9. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
section 8 of this act, an authorized third party may provide the
following services:
(a) Provide to and accept from a customer an application for:
(1) Registration, renewal of registration, transfer of
registration and reinstatement of registration of a motor vehicle or
an off-highway vehicle;
(2) A certificate of title, transfer of title and a duplicate or
substitute certificate of title;
(3) License plates, including, without limitation, special
license plates, duplicate number plates and substitute number
plates; and
(4) A permit to operate a vehicle authorized in
NRS 482.396.
(b) Obtain on behalf of an applicant or, in the case of a Class I
authorized third party, issue to an applicant who satisfies the
requirements of this chapter or chapter 490 of NRS, as applicable:
(1) A certificate of registration, including, without
limitation, a duplicate or substitute certificate of registration;
(2) A certificate of title, including, without limitation, a
duplicate or substitute certificate of title;
(3) License plates;
(4) A decal or a substitute decal for a license plate; and
(5) A permit to operate a vehicle pursuant to NRS 482.396.
(c) Notarize documents required to be notarized by this
chapter, provided that such services are provided by a notary
public appointed by the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 240.010.
(d) Submit change of address information to the Department
on behalf of a customer of the authorized third party.
(e) Accept license plates that are required to be surrendered to
the Department. The authorized third party must deliver the
license plates to the Department within 5 business days after
receipt.
(f) Submit information to the Department regarding a
customer who has claimed an exemption pursuant to NRS
371.101, transferred an exemption pursuant to NRS 371.103,
made a payment pursuant to NRS 371.1035 or file an affidavit
pursuant to NRS 371.104.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, an
authorized third party must collect for each service provided the
fees required by this chapter or chapter 490, as applicable,
including, without limitation, all applicable governmental services
-
*SB243*

– 12 –
taxes, and remit those fees and taxes to the Department not less
than daily.
3. An authorized third party may:
(a) Collect and retain for each service provided a reasonable
convenience fee; and
(b) Add the cost for expedited processing of services if
requested by the applicant.
4. A Class I authorized third party may retain from the fees
required by this chapter or chapter 490 of NRS, as applicable, and
collected by the Class I authorized third party:
(a) Two dollars for each issuance of:
(1) A certificate of registration.
(2) License plates, including special license plates.
(3) A certificate of title.
(4) A permit to operate a vehicle pursuant to NRS 482.396.
(b) One dollar for each issuance of:
(1) A duplicate or substitute certificate of registration.
(2) Substitute number plates.
(3) Duplicate number plates.
5. An authorized third party must post the fees authorized by
this section, along with fees required by this chapter or chapter
490 of NRS, as applicable, for each service provided by the
authorized third party:
(a) For a Class I authorized third party, in every physical
location where the authorized third party provides services; and
(b) On the Internet website of the authorized third party, if
applicable.
6. Fees posted pursuant to subsection 5 must be broken down
into the following categories:
(a) Fees required by the Department or by statute, including,
without limitation, any fee retained pursuant to subsection 4.
(b) Convenience fees charged by the authorized third party.
(c) The fee for expedited service, if applicable.
7. If at any time a Class I authorized third party is unable to
account for an unissued certificate of registration, certificate of
title, license plate, decal or permit, the authorized third party must
immediately pay to the Department an amount established by the
Department by regulation.
8. An authorized third party may not provide any of the
services authorized in subsection 1 for:
(a) Autonomous vehicles, as defined in NRS 482A.030.
(b) Vehicles required to be registered through the Motor
Carrier Division of the Department.
(c) Vehicles required to be registered pursuant to chapter 706
of NRS.
-
*SB243*

– 13 –
(d) An abandoned recreational vehicle pursuant to
NRS 482.262.
9. An authorized third party may provide any of the services
authorized in subsection 1 for:
(a) Vehicles owned by a short-term lessor.
(b) Specially constructed, reconstructed, rebuilt or foreign
vehicles.
(c) A replica vehicle or military tactical vehicle, as those terms
are defined in NRS 445B.759.
(d) A person seeking a certificate of title pursuant to NRS
482.2605 or a salvage title pursuant to NRS 487.820.
10. All the fees authorized by this section to be charged and
retained by an authorized third party shall be deemed to be a cost
of administration with respect to the operation of motor vehicles
upon the public highways of this State.
Sec. 10. A person may engage in the activities of a Class II
authorized third party if the person is registered as a document
preparation service with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter
240A of NRS and has an active business license in the city or
county where the Class II authorized third party conducts
business.
Sec. 11. 1. A person shall not engage in the activity of a
Class I authorized third party in this State without first obtaining a
license from the Department. Before issuing a license as a Class I
authorized third party to an applicant, the Department shall
require:
(a) Proof that the applicant is registered as a document
preparation service with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter
240A of NRS and has been registered as such for not less than 3
years immediately preceding the date of the application.
(b) An application, signed and verified by the applicant, which
includes the applicant’s residential address, social security
number, the address of the principal place of business of the
applicant and the address of each additional physical location at
which the applicant intends to conduct business as a Class I
authorized third party.
(c) A statement as to whether any previous application of the
applicant for a license as a Class I authorized third party has been
denied or whether such a license has been suspended or revoked.
(d) Payment of a nonrefundable license fee of $150 for each
physical location at which the applicant intends to conduct
business as a Class I authorized third party.
(e) For initial licensure, the submission of a complete set of
the applicant’s fingerprints and written permission authorizing the
Department to forward those fingerprints to the Central
-
*SB243*

– 14 –
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.
(f) A fee for the processing of fingerprints. The Department
shall establish by regulation the fee for processing fingerprints.
The fee must not exceed the sum of the amounts charged by the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History and
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for processing the
fingerprints.
(g) If the applicant is a natural person, the statement required
pursuant to section 12 of this act.
2. A license issued pursuant to this section expires on
December 31 of the year in which it was issued and may be
renewed by payment to the Department of the annual renewal fee
of $50 and, if the licensee is a natural person, submission of the
statement required pursuant to section 12 of this act.
3. If a licensee fails to renew his or her license before it
expires on December 31, the license may be reinstated upon
submission to the Department:
(a) The annual renewal fee of $50;
(b) A late fee of $25; and
(c) If the licensee is a natural person, the statement required
pursuant to section 12 of this act.
4. The Department shall issue a license to each qualified
applicant in a competitively neutral and nondiscriminatory
manner as to all similarly situated applicants.
 The Director may deny the issuance of a license to an applicant
or revoke a license already issued if the Department is satisfied
that the applicant or licensee is not entitled thereto.
5. If an application for a Class 1 authorized third party’s
license has been denied, the applicant may reapply not earlier
than 30 days after the denial.
6. A Class I authorized third party’s license must be posted in
a conspicuous place on the premises of the Class I authorized
third party’s principal place of business.
7. If any information submitted in the application for a
license as a Class I authorized third party changes, the Class I
authorized third party shall submit a written notice of the change
to the Department within 10 days after the change occurs.
8. Upon the receipt of any report or complaint alleging that
an applicant or a licensee has engaged in financial misconduct or
has failed to satisfy financial obligations related to the activity of a
Class I authorized third party, the Department may require the
applicant or licensee to submit to the Department an authorization
for the disclosure of financial records for the business as provided
in NRS 239A.090. The Department may only obtain information
-
*SB243*

– 15 –
pursuant to such an authorization that is specifically related to the
transaction raised in the report or complaint and may only use
such information to determine the suitability of the applicant or
licensee for initial or continued licensure. Information obtained
pursuant to such an authorization may be disclosed only to those
employees of the Department who are authorized to issue a license
to an applicant pursuant to this section or to determine the
suitability of an applicant or a licensee for such licensure.
9. Any person who engages in the activity of a Class I
authorized third party without a license issued by the Department
pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 12. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an
applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license as a Class I
authorized third party shall submit to the Department the
statement prescribed by the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to NRS 425.520. The statement must be completed and
signed by the applicant.
2. The Department shall include the statement required
pursuant to subsection 1 in:
(a) The application or any other forms that must be submitted
for the issuance or renewal of the license; or
(b) A separate form prescribed by the Department.
3. A license as a Class I authorized third party may not be
issued or renewed by the Department if the applicant:
(a) Fails to complete or submit the statement required
pursuant to subsection 1; or
(b) Indicates on the statement submitted pursuant to
subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the
support of a child and is not in compliance with the order or a
plan approved by the district attorney or other public agency
enforcing the order for the repayment of the amount owed
pursuant to the order.
4. If an applicant indicates on the statement submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court
order for the support of a child and is not in compliance with the
order or a plan approved by the district attorney or other public
agency enforcing the order for the repayment of the amount owed
pursuant to the order, the Department shall advise the applicant to
contact the district attorney or other public agency enforcing the
order to determine the actions that the applicant may take to
satisfy the arrearage.
Sec. 13. 1. No license may be issued to an applicant for
licensure as a Class I authorized third party until the applicant
procures and files with the Department a good and sufficient bond
-
*SB243*

– 16 –
in the amount of $250,000, with a corporate surety thereon,
licensed to do business in the State of Nevada, approved as to form
by the Attorney General, and conditioned that the applicant shall
conduct business as a Class I authorized third party without fraud
or fraudulent representation, and in compliance with the
provisions of sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this act. The
Department may, by agreement with any Class I authorized third
party who has been licensed by the Department for 5 years or
more, allow a reduction in the amount of the bond of the Class I
authorized third party, if the business of the Class I authorized
third party has been conducted satisfactorily for the preceding 5
years, but no bond may be in an amount less than $100,000.
2. The bond may be continuous in form and the total
aggregate liability on the bond must be limited to the payment of
the total amount of the bond.
3. The bond must provide that any person injured by the
action of a Class I authorized third party or any employee of a
Class I authorized third party in violation of any of the provisions
of sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this act may apply to the Director
for compensation from the bond. The Director, for good cause
shown and after notice and opportunity for hearing, may
determine the amount of compensation and the person to whom it
is to be paid. The surety shall then make the payment.
4. In lieu of a bond, a licensee or applicant for licensure as a
Class I authorized third party may deposit with the Department,
under the terms prescribed by the Department:
(a) A like amount of money or bonds of the United States or of
the State of Nevada of an actual market value of not less than the
amount fixed by the Department; or
(b) A savings certificate of a bank, credit union, savings and
loan association or savings bank situated in Nevada, which must
indicate an account of an amount equal to the amount of the bond
which would otherwise be required by this section and that this
amount is unavailable for withdrawal except upon order of the
Department. Interest earned on the certificate accrues to the
account of the applicant or licensee.
5. A deposit made pursuant to subsection 4 may be disbursed
by the Director, for good cause shown and after notice and
opportunity for hearing, in an amount determined by the Director
to compensate a person injured by an action of the licensee, or
released upon receipt of:
(a) An order of a court requiring the Director to release all or
a specified portion of the deposit; or
(b) A statement signed by the person under whose name the
deposit is made and acknowledged before any person authorized to
-
*SB243*

– 17 –
take acknowledgments in this State, requesting the Director to
release the deposit, or a specified portion thereof, and stating the
purpose for which the release is requested.
6. When a deposit is made pursuant to subsection 4, liability
under the deposit is in the amount prescribed by the Department.
If the amount of the deposit is reduced or there is an outstanding
judgment of a court for which the licensee is liable under the
deposit, the license is automatically suspended. The license must
be reinstated if the licensee:
(a) Files an additional bond pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Restores the deposit with the Department to the original
amount required under this section; or
(c) Satisfies the outstanding judgment for which he or she is
liable under the deposit.
7. A deposit made pursuant to subsection 4 may be refunded:
(a) By order of the Director, 3 years after the date the licensee
ceases to be licensed by the Department, if the Director is satisfied
that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit; or
(b) By order of the court, at any time within 3 years after the
date the licensee ceases to be licensed by the Department, upon
evidence satisfactory to the court that there are no outstanding
claims against the deposit.
8. Any money received by the Department pursuant to
subsection 4 must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit
to the Motor Vehicle Fund.
Sec. 14. 1. The Department may refuse to issue or renew or
may suspend or revoke a license as a Class I authorized third party
upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Conviction of:
(1) A felony in this State or any other state, territory or
nation; or
(2) Any offense involving fraud, theft, embezzlement,
burglary, robbery, fraudulent conversion or misappropriation of
property within the immediately preceding 7 years.
(b) Material misstatement in the application for a license.
(c) Evidence of unfitness of the applicant or licensee.
(d) Willful failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter
or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or any law relating to
the operation of a motor vehicle.
(e) Failure or refusal to furnish and keep in force any bond
required pursuant to section 13 of this act.
(f) Failure of the applicant or licensee to maintain any other
license required by any political subdivision of this State.
(g) Failure to have or maintain a physical place of business in
this State.
-
*SB243*

– 18 –
(h) Failure or refusal by the applicant or licensee to pay or
otherwise discharge a final judgment rendered and entered
against the applicant or licensee, arising out of the
misrepresentation of any service provided by the applicant or
licensee as an authorized third party or out of a fraud committed
in connection with the services provided by the applicant or
licensee as an authorized third party.
(i) The Department determines that the applicant or licensee is
not entitled to the license.
2. Any person whose application is denied or whose license is
refused to renew, suspended or revoked pursuant to this section is
entitled to judicial review of the decision in the manner provided
by chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 15. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
no employee of a Class I authorized third party may conduct
transactions with customers or provide any of the services
authorized in section 9 of this act at a physical location operated
by the Class I authorized third party until the employee has
successfully completed training provided pursuant to subsection 1
of section 8 of this act. An employee who is a Class II authorized
third party may perform services authorized for Class II
authorized third parties.
2. No employee of a Class I authorized third party may
conduct transactions with customers or provide any of the services
authorized in section 9 of this act if the employee has been
convicted of:
(a) A felony in this State or any other state, territory or nation;
or
(b) Any offense involving fraud, theft, embezzlement, burglary,
robbery, fraudulent conversion or misappropriation of property
within the immediately preceding 7 years.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, within 5 days
after hiring any employee who will conduct transactions with
customers or provide any of the services authorized in section 9 of
this act, a Class I authorized third party shall:
(a) Obtain a written statement from the employee stating
whether he or she has been convicted of any crime listed in
subsection 2;
(b) Obtain from the employee one set of fingerprints and a
written authorization to forward the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(c) Submit to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History the fingerprints obtained pursuant to paragraph
(b) to obtain information on the background and personal history
-
*SB243*

– 19 –
of each employee to determine whether the person has been
convicted of any crime listed in subsection 2.
4. A Class I authorized third party is not required to obtain
the information described in subsection 3 from an employee if his
or her fingerprints have been submitted to the Central Repository
for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report within the
immediately preceding 6 months and the report of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation indicated that the employee has not been
convicted of any crime set forth in subsection 2.
5. A Class I authorized third party shall conduct an
investigation pursuant to this section of each employee who
conducts transactions with customers or provides any of the
services authorized in section 9 of this act at least once every 5
years after the initial investigation.
Sec. 16. 1. An authorized third party must obtain and
compile any records required to be compiled by the Department by
regulation. Such records must be:
(a) Retained by the authorized third party for a time period
determined by the Department by regulation; and
(b) Open to inspection by any peace officer, investigator of the
Department or any employee of the Department who is authorized
by the Department to inspect such records.
2. The records required pursuant to subsection 1 must
include, without limitation, records which track the amount and
type of services provided by the authorized third party.
Sec. 17. NRS 482.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 482.0105 to 482.137,
inclusive, and sections 5, 6 and 7 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 18. NRS 482.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.160 1. The Director may adopt and enforce such
administrative regulations as are necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
2. The Director may establish branch offices as provided in
NRS 481.055, and may by contract appoint any person or public
agency as an agent to assist in carrying out the duties of the
Department pursuant to this chapter.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection [,] and
section 9 of this act, the contract with each agent appointed by the
Department in connection with the registration of motor vehicles
and issuance of license plates may provide for compensation based
upon the reasonable value of the services of the agent but must not
exceed $2 for each registration. An authorized inspection station or
-
*SB243*

– 20 –
authorized station that issues certificates of registration pursuant to
NRS 482.281 and a Class I authorized third party is not entitled to
receive compensation from the Department pursuant to this
subsection.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person may
use in an advertisement:
(a) The name, service marks, trademarks or logo of the
Department; or
(b) A service mark, trademark or logo designed to closely
resemble a service mark, trademark or logo of the Department and
intended to mislead a viewer to believe that the service mark,
trademark or logo is the service mark, trademark or logo of the
Department.
5. An agent appointed pursuant to subsection 2 or NRS
487.815 may use the name, service marks, trademarks or logo of the
Department in an advertisement if the agent has obtained the written
permission of the Department for such use.
6. [A document preparation service registered pursuant to
chapter 240A of NRS] An authorized third party may use the term
“Department of Motor Vehicles” or “DMV” in an advertisement if:
(a) The term is immediately followed by the term “services” or
“registration services” or other similar language which clearly
indicates that the [document preparation service] authorized third
party is a third-party business and that the advertisement is not an
advertisement of the Department; and
(b) The advertisement includes a clear and conspicuous
statement that the [document preparation service] authorized third
party is a third-party business not affiliated with the Department.
The statement must be of a conspicuous size, if in writing, and must
appear in substantially the following form:

THIS DOCUMENT PREPARATION SERVICE IS A
THIRD-PARTY BUSINESS NOT AFFILIATED WITH
THE NEVADA DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES.

Sec. 19. NRS 482.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.170 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115,
481.063, 483.651, 483.655, 483.657 and 485.316, and section 8 of
this act, all personal information in the records of registration and
licensing in the offices of the Department is confidential and must
not knowingly be disclosed by the Department.
Sec. 20. NRS 482.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.175 The Department and the officers and deputies thereof ,
Class I authorized third parties and registered dealers shall
examine, and to the best of their ability determine the genuineness
-
*SB243*

– 21 –
and regularity of, every registration and transfer of registration of a
vehicle as provided in this chapter, in order that every certificate
issued for a vehicle must contain true statements of the ownership
thereof, and to prevent the registration of a vehicle by any person
not entitled thereto. The Department , a Class I authorized third
party or a registered dealer may require any applicant to furnish
such information in addition to that contained in the application as
may be necessary to satisfy the Department of the truth and
regularity of the application.
Sec. 21. NRS 482.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.205 Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and NRS
706.188, every owner of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer
intended to be operated upon any highway in this State shall, before
the motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer can be operated, apply to the
Department , a Class I authorized third party or a registered dealer
for and obtain the registration thereof.
Sec. 22. NRS 482.206 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.206 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 482.2065 and 482.2085, every motor vehicle, except for a
motor vehicle that is required to be registered through the Motor
Carrier Division of the Department, and except for a full trailer or
semitrailer that is registered pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
482.483 or a moped registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155, must be
registered for a period of 12 consecutive months beginning the day
after the first registration by the owner in this State.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 7 and 8 and
NRS 482.2065, every vehicle registered by an agent of the
Department , a Class I authorized third party or a registered dealer
must be registered for 12 consecutive months beginning the first day
of the month after the first registration by the owner in this State.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
482.2065 and 482.2085, a motor vehicle which must be registered
through the Motor Carrier Division of the Department, including,
without limitation:
(a) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 706.801 to 706.861,
inclusive; or
(b) As a commercial motor vehicle which has a declared gross
weight in excess of 10,000 pounds,
 must be registered for a period of 12 consecutive months
beginning on the date established by the Department by regulation.
4. Upon the application of the owner of a fleet of vehicles
which are not required to be registered through the Motor Carrier
Division of the Department, the Director may permit the owner to
register the fleet on the basis of a calendar year.
-
*SB243*

– 22 –
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 6, 7 and 8,
when the registration of any vehicle is transferred pursuant to NRS
482.399, the expiration date of each regular license plate, special
license plate or substitute decal must, at the time of the transfer of
registration, be advanced for a period of 12 consecutive months
beginning:
(a) The first day of the month after the transfer, if the vehicle is
transferred by an agent of the Department; or
(b) The day after the transfer in all other cases,
 and a credit on the portion of the fee for registration and
the governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of the
current period of registration must be allowed pursuant to the
applicable provisions of NRS 482.399.
6. When the registration of any trailer that is registered for a 3-
year period pursuant to NRS 482.2065 is transferred pursuant to
NRS 482.399, the expiration date of each license plate or substitute
decal must, at the time of the transfer of the registration, be
advanced, if applicable pursuant to NRS 482.2065, for a period of 3
consecutive years beginning:
(a) The first day of the month after the transfer, if the trailer is
transferred by an agent of the Department; or
(b) The day after the transfer in all other cases,
 and a credit on the portion of the fee for registration and
the governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of the
current period of registration must be allowed pursuant to the
applicable provisions of NRS 482.399.
7. A full trailer or semitrailer that is registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 is registered until the date on which
the owner of the full trailer or semitrailer:
(a) Transfers the ownership of the full trailer or semitrailer; or
(b) Cancels the registration of the full trailer or semitrailer and
surrenders the license plates to the Department [.] or an authorized
third party.
8. A moped that is registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155 is
registered until the date on which the owner of the moped:
(a) Transfers the ownership of the moped; or
(b) Cancels the registration of the moped and surrenders the
license plate to the Department [.] or an authorized third party.
Sec. 23. NRS 482.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.215 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085
and 482.2155, all applications for registration, except applications
for renewal of registration, must be made as provided in this section.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.294, applications
for all registrations, except renewals of registration, must be made in
-
*SB243*

– 23 –
person, if practicable, to any office or agent of the Department , to a
Class I authorized third party or to a registered dealer.
3. Each application must be made upon the appropriate form
furnished by the Department and contain:
(a) The signature of the owner, except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2 of NRS 482.294, if applicable.
(b) The owner’s residential address.
(c) The owner’s declaration of the county where he or she
intends the vehicle to be based, unless the vehicle is deemed to have
no base. The Department shall use this declaration to determine the
county to which the governmental services tax is to be paid.
(d) If required pursuant to NRS 482.2177, the mileage shown on
the odometer of the vehicle at the time of application and any other
information required by the Department.
(e) A brief description of the vehicle to be registered, including
the name of the maker, the engine, identification or serial number,
whether new or used, and the last license number, if known, and the
state in which it was issued, and upon the registration of a new
vehicle, the date of sale by the manufacturer or franchised and
licensed dealer in this State for the make to be registered to the
person first purchasing or operating the vehicle.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, if the
applicant is not an owner of a fleet of vehicles or a person described
in subsection 5:
(1) Proof satisfactory to the Department , Class I authorized
third party or registered dealer that the applicant carries insurance
on the vehicle provided by an insurance company licensed by the
Division of Insurance of the Department of Business and Industry
and approved to do business in this State as required by NRS
485.185; and
(2) A declaration signed by the applicant that he or she will
maintain the insurance required by NRS 485.185 during the period
of registration. If the application is submitted by electronic means
pursuant to NRS 482.294, the applicant is not required to sign the
declaration required by this subparagraph.
(g) If the applicant is an owner of a fleet of vehicles or a person
described in subsection 5, evidence of insurance provided by an
insurance company licensed by the Division of Insurance of the
Department of Business and Industry and approved to do business in
this State as required by NRS 485.185:
(1) In the form of a certificate of insurance on a form
approved by the Commissioner of Insurance;
(2) In the form of a card issued pursuant to NRS 690B.023
which identifies the vehicle or the registered owner of the vehicle;
or
-
*SB243*

– 24 –
(3) In another form satisfactory to the Department, including,
without limitation, an electronic format authorized by
NRS 690B.023.
 The Department may file that evidence, return it to the applicant
or otherwise dispose of it.
(h) If required, evidence of the applicant’s compliance with
controls over emission.
(i) If the application for registration is submitted via the Internet,
a statement which informs the applicant that he or she may make a
nonrefundable monetary contribution of $2 for each vehicle
registered for the Complete Streets Program, if any, created pursuant
to NRS 244.2643, 277A.285 or 403.575, as applicable, based on the
declaration made pursuant to paragraph (c). The application form
must state in a clear and conspicuous manner that a contribution for
a Complete Streets Program is nonrefundable and voluntary and is
in addition to any fees required for registration, and must include a
method by which the applicant must indicate his or her intention to
opt in or opt out of making such a contribution.
4. The application must contain such other information as is
required by the Department , Class I authorized third party or
registered dealer and must be accompanied by proof of ownership
satisfactory to the Department.
5. For purposes of the evidence required by paragraph (g) of
subsection 3:
(a) Vehicles which are subject to the fee for a license and the
requirements of registration of the Interstate Highway User Fee
Apportionment Act, and which are based in this State, may be
declared as a fleet by the registered owner thereof on his or her
original application for or application for renewal of a proportional
registration. The owner may file a single certificate of insurance
covering that fleet.
(b) Other fleets composed of 10 or more vehicles based in this
State or vehicles insured under a blanket policy which does not
identify individual vehicles may each be declared annually as a fleet
by the registered owner thereof for the purposes of an application
for his or her original or any renewed registration. The owner may
file a single certificate of insurance covering that fleet.
(c) A person who qualifies as a self-insurer pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 485.380 may file a copy of his or her certificate
of self-insurance.
(d) A person who qualifies for an operator’s policy of liability
insurance pursuant to the provisions of NRS 485.186 and 485.3091
may file or provide electronic evidence of that insurance.
-
*SB243*

– 25 –
Sec. 24. NRS 482.2155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2155 1. The owner of a moped shall, before the moped
may be operated upon any highway in this State, apply to the
Department or a Class I authorized third party for and obtain
registration thereof. The application must be made upon the
appropriate form as prescribed by the Department.
2. An application for the registration of a moped pursuant to
this section must include:
(a) The signature and residential address of the owner of the
moped.
(b) The owner’s declaration of the county where he or she
intends the moped to be based, unless the moped is deemed to have
no base. The Department shall use this declaration to determine the
county to which the governmental services tax is to be paid.
(c) A brief description of the moped to be registered, including
the name of the maker, the engine, identification or serial number,
whether new or used, and, upon the registration of a new moped, the
date of sale by the manufacturer or franchised and licensed dealer in
this State for the make to be registered to the person first purchasing
or operating the moped.
(d) Proof of ownership satisfactory to the Department [.] or a
Class I authorized third party.
3. An application for the registration of a moped pursuant to
subsection 2 must be accompanied by:
(a) The registration fee required pursuant to NRS 482.480.
(b) The governmental services tax imposed pursuant to chapter
371 of NRS, as provided in NRS 482.260.
(c) The fees for a license plate and an inspection required
pursuant to this section.
4. An applicant for the registration of a moped pursuant to this
section must provide proof satisfactory to the Department or Class I
authorized third party that the moped was inspected and meets the
definition of “moped” as provided in NRS 482.069. An applicant
who:
(a) Purchased the moped from a new vehicle dealer or a used
vehicle dealer may submit to the Department [,] or Class I
authorized third party, on a form prescribed by the Department,
verification of an inspection by the new vehicle dealer or used
vehicle dealer which certifies that the moped meets the definition of
“moped” as provided in NRS 482.069.
(b) Did not purchase the moped from a new vehicle dealer or a
used vehicle dealer and:
(1) Resides in a county where an office of the Department or
a Class I authorized third party with a physical location is located
must, at an office of the Department or the physical location of a
-
*SB243*

– 26 –
Class I authorized third party in that county, allow the Department
or the Class I authorized third party to inspect the moped for
verification that the moped meets the definition of “moped” as
provided in NRS 482.069. The Department may by regulation
establish a fee for such an inspection.
(2) Resides in a county where no office of the Department or
Class I authorized third party with a physical location is located
must allow the Department or a Class I authorized third party to
inspect the moped, as specified in subparagraph (1), at an office of
the Department or the physical location of a Class I authorized
third party in another county or, in lieu of an inspection by the
Department [,] or a Class I authorized third party, allow a sheriff or
deputy sheriff of the county in which the applicant resides to inspect
the moped for verification that the moped meets the definition of
“moped” as provided in NRS 482.069. A sheriff or deputy sheriff
shall, upon the request of the applicant, conduct such an inspection
and transmit his or her determination, in writing, to the Department
or a Class I authorized third party, as requested by the applicant,
and may collect the fee established by the Department pursuant to
subparagraph (1) for such an inspection. The fees must be accounted
for as provided in subsection 6 of NRS 248.275.
5. As soon as practicable after the Department [:] or Class I
authorized third party:
(a) Receives the application and fees required by this section;
and
(b) Receives the form completed by a new vehicle dealer or used
vehicle dealer pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 4, conducts
the inspection required by subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 4 or receives the alternative written determination from a
sheriff or deputy sheriff that is authorized by subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (b) of subsection 4,
 the Department or Class I authorized third party shall, if the
inspection by the Department or a Class I authorized third party or
the written determination from a sheriff or deputy sheriff that is
authorized by subsection 4 confirms that the moped meets the
definition of “moped” as provided in NRS 482.069, issue a license
plate and certificate of registration to the owner of the moped.
6. The fee for the issuance of a license plate pursuant to this
section is $5, which must be allocated to the Revolving Account for
the Issuance of Special License Plates, created by NRS 482.1805, to
defray the costs of manufacturing license plates pursuant to this
section.
7. The registration issued pursuant to this section is not
renewable or transferable, and a moped that is registered pursuant to
-
*SB243*

– 27 –
this section is registered until the date on which the owner of the
moped:
(a) Transfers the ownership of the moped; or
(b) Cancels the registration of the moped and surrenders the
license plate to the Department [.] or an authorized third party.
8. The Department or a Class I authorized third party may,
upon proof of ownership satisfactory to it, issue a certificate of title
before the registration of a moped pursuant to this section. A
certificate of title issued pursuant to this subsection is valid until
cancelled by the Department upon the transfer of interest therein.
Sec. 25. NRS 482.2177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2177 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
upon application for the initial registration of any motor vehicle
pursuant to this chapter, the applicant shall provide the Department ,
or Class I authorized third party or registered dealer the mileage
shown on the odometer of the vehicle at the time of application and
any other information required by the Department. Upon application
for the transfer of registration pursuant to NRS 482.399 to another
motor vehicle, the applicant shall provide to the Department , or
Class I authorized third party or registered dealer the mileage
shown on the odometer of the vehicle to which the registration is to
be transferred at the time of application and any other information
required by the Department.
2. At the time of renewal of registration of a motor vehicle
pursuant to this chapter, the mileage shown on the odometer of the
vehicle and any other information required by the Department must
be provided to the Department as follows:
(a) If the vehicle is required upon renewal of registration to
submit evidence of compliance with standards for the control of
emissions pursuant to chapter 445B of NRS, the mileage shown on
the odometer of the vehicle at the time of the inspection and any
other information required by the Department must be noted on the
evidence of compliance.
(b) If the vehicle is not required upon renewal of registration to
submit evidence of compliance with standards for the control of
emissions pursuant to chapter 445B of NRS, the mileage shown on
the odometer of the vehicle at the time of renewal and any other
information required by the Department must be noted by the owner
in a manner prescribed by the Department.
3. Upon the transfer of the ownership of or interest in a motor
vehicle and the expiration of the registration pursuant to NRS
482.399, the holder of the original registration must provide to the
Department the mileage shown on the odometer of the vehicle at
the time of the transfer and any other information required by the
Department in a manner prescribed by the Department.
-
*SB243*

– 28 –
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to a:
(a) Motorcycle or moped.
(b) Recreational vehicle.
(c) Vehicle that is exempt from registration pursuant to
NRS 482.210.
(d) Vehicle registered as a farm vehicle.
(e) Vehicle that is registered through the Motor Carrier Division
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 706.801 to 706.861, inclusive,
and which has a declared gross weight in excess of 10,000 pounds.
(f) Vehicle that has been exempted by regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 482.2175.
5. The Department or its agents may inspect the odometer of a
vehicle for which the mileage shown on the odometer is reported
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 not more than once every
2 years to verify the mileage reported.
Sec. 26. NRS 482.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.220 1. If the vehicle to be registered is a specially
constructed, reconstructed, rebuilt or foreign vehicle, that fact must
be stated in the application. If the vehicle is a foreign vehicle which
has been registered theretofore outside of this State, the owner shall
exhibit to the Department or a Class I authorized third party the
certificate of title and registration card or other evidence of such
former registration as may be in the applicant’s possession or
control or such other evidence as will satisfy the Department or
Class I authorized third party that the applicant is the lawful owner
or possessor of the vehicle.
2. The application must be accompanied by a motor vehicle
inspection certificate signed by a representative of the Department
or, as one of the Department’s authorized agents, by:
(a) A peace officer;
(b) A dealer;
(c) A rebuilder;
(d) An automobile wrecker; or
(e) A garage operator or a service station operator or attendant,
so designated in writing by the Director.
3. Except for a peace officer acting in his or her official
capacity, the Department or any of its authorized inspection agents
shall charge the fee imposed by the Department by regulation for
inspection of any vehicle described in subsection 1.
4. For the purposes of this section, “peace officer” means any
employee, volunteer or designee of a law enforcement agency acting
in an official capacity.
Sec. 27. NRS 482.224 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.224 1. The Department and any Class I authorized third
party, in combination, may not issue a certificate of registration for
-
*SB243*

– 29 –
more than 100 replica vehicles each year. The fact that the vehicle is
to be registered as a replica vehicle must be stated in the application
for registration.
2. For purposes of this section, “replica vehicle” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 445B.759.
Sec. 28. NRS 482.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.225 1. When application is made to the Department or a
Class I authorized third party for registration of a vehicle
purchased outside this State and not previously registered within
this State where the registrant or owner at the time of purchase was
not a resident of or employed in this State, the Department , [or] its
agent or the Class I authorized third party shall determine and
collect any sales or use tax due and shall remit the tax to the
Department of Taxation except as otherwise provided in
NRS 482.260.
2. If the registrant or owner of the vehicle was a resident of the
State, or employed within the State, at the time of the purchase of
that vehicle, it is presumed that the vehicle was purchased for use
within the State and the representative or agent of the Department of
Taxation shall collect the tax and remit it to the Department of
Taxation.
3. Until all applicable taxes and fees are collected, the
Department or a Class I authorized third party shall refuse to
register the vehicle.
4. In any county whose population is less than 55,000, the
Department shall designate the county assessor as the agent of the
Department for the collection of any sales or use tax.
5. If the registrant or owner desires to refute the presumption
stated in subsection 2 that he or she purchased the vehicle for use in
this State, the registrant or owner must pay the tax to the
Department or Class I authorized third party and then may submit
a claim for exemption in writing, signed by the registrant or owner
or his or her authorized representative, to the Department together
with a claim for refund of tax erroneously or illegally collected.
6. If the Department finds that the tax has been erroneously or
illegally collected, the tax must be refunded.
Sec. 29. NRS 482.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.230 The Department , a Class I authorized third party or a
registered dealer shall not grant an application for the registration of
a vehicle in any of the following events:
1. When the applicant therefor is not entitled thereto pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter.
2. When the applicant has neglected or refused to furnish the
Department , Class I authorized third party or registered dealer
with the information required in the appropriate official form or
-
*SB243*

– 30 –
reasonable additional information required by the Department ,
Class I authorized third party or registered dealer.
3. When the fees required therefor by law have not been paid.
4. When the applicant for the registration of a commercial
motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating, a combined gross
vehicle weight rating, a gross vehicle weight or a combined gross
vehicle weight in excess of 26,000 pounds and which is intended to
operate in intrastate commerce is a motor carrier who:
(a) Has not complied with NRS 482.2912; or
(b) Is subject to an out-of-service order.
Sec. 30. NRS 482.231 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.231 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
Department or a Class I authorized third party shall not register a
motor vehicle if a local authority has filed with the Department a
notice stating that the owner of the motor vehicle:
(a) Was cited by a constable pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS
258.070 for failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 482.385;
and
(b) After the imposition of punishment pursuant to NRS
482.385, has failed to pay the fee charged by the constable pursuant
to subsection 6 of NRS 258.070.
2. The Department shall, upon request, furnish to the owner of
the motor vehicle a copy of the notice of nonpayment described in
subsection 1.
3. The Department or Class I authorized third party may
register a motor vehicle for which the Department has received a
notice of nonpayment described in subsection 1 if:
(a) The Department or Class I authorized third party receives:
(1) A receipt from the owner of the motor vehicle which
indicates that the owner has paid the fee charged by the constable;
or
(2) Notification from the applicable local authority that the
owner of the motor vehicle has paid the fee charged by the
constable; and
(b) The owner of the motor vehicle otherwise complies with the
requirements of this chapter for the registration of the motor vehicle.
Sec. 31. NRS 482.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.235 1. The Department shall file each application
received and register the vehicle therein described and the owner
thereof in suitable books or on index cards as follows:
(a) Under a distinctive registration number assigned to the
vehicle and to the owner thereof, referred to in this chapter as the
registration number.
(b) Alphabetically under the name of the owner.
-
*SB243*

– 31 –
(c) Numerically under the serial or vehicle identification number
of the vehicle or a permanent identifying number, as may be
determined by the Department.
2. A registered dealer or Class I authorized third party who
registers a vehicle shall assign a registration number for that vehicle
according to a list of registration numbers issued by the Department
for use by that dealer [.] or Class I authorized third party.
Sec. 32. NRS 482.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.240 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085,
upon the registration of a vehicle, the Department , a Class I
authorized third party or a registered dealer shall issue a certificate
of registration to the owner.
2. When an applicant for registration or transfer of registration
is unable, for any reason, to submit to the Department or a Class I
authorized third party, as applicable, in support of the application
for registration, or transfer of registration, such documentary
evidence of legal ownership as, in the opinion of the Department [,]
or Class I authorized third party, as applicable, is sufficient to
establish the legal ownership of the vehicle concerned in
the application for registration or transfer of registration, the
Department or Class I authorized third party may issue to the
applicant only a certificate of registration.
3. The Department may, upon proof of ownership satisfactory
to it or pursuant to NRS 482.2605, issue a certificate of title before
the registration of the vehicle concerned. The certificate of
registration issued pursuant to this chapter is valid only during the
registration period or calendar year for which it is issued, and a
certificate of title is valid until cancelled by the Department or Class
I authorized third party upon the transfer of interest therein.
Sec. 33. NRS 482.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.245 1. The certificate of registration must contain
the date issued, the registration number assigned to the vehicle, the
name and address of the registered owner, the county where the
vehicle is to be based unless it is deemed to have no base, a
description of the registered vehicle and such other statement of
facts as may be determined by the Department.
2. The certificate of title must contain the date issued, the name
and address of the registered owner and the owner or lienholder, if
any, a description of the vehicle, any entries required by NRS
482.423 to 482.428, inclusive, a reading of the vehicle’s odometer
as provided to the Department or Class I authorized third party by
the person making the sale or transfer, the word “rebuilt” if it is a
rebuilt vehicle, the information required pursuant to subsection 4 of
NRS 482.247 if the certificate of title is a certificate of title in
beneficiary form pursuant to NRS 482.247 and such other statement
-
*SB243*

– 32 –
of facts as may be determined by the Department. The certificate of
title must also contain forms for notice to the Department or Class I
authorized third party of a transfer of the title or interest of the
owner or lienholder and application for registration by the
transferee. If a new certificate of title is issued for a vehicle, it must
contain the same information as the replaced certificate, except to
the extent that the information has changed after the issuance of the
replaced certificate. Except as otherwise required by federal law, the
certificate of title of a vehicle which the Department or a Class I
authorized third party knows to have been stolen must not contain
any statement or other indication that the mileage specified in the
certificate or registered on the odometer is anything other than the
actual mileage traveled by the vehicle, in the absence of proof that
the odometer of the vehicle has been disconnected, reset or altered.
Sec. 34. NRS 482.247 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.247 1. The owner or joint owners of a motor vehicle,
trailer or semitrailer may request the Department or a Class I
authorized third party to issue a certificate of title in beneficiary
form for the motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer, as applicable,
which includes a directive to the Department to transfer the
certificate of title upon the death of the owner or upon the death of
all joint owners to a beneficiary named on the face of the certificate
of title.
2. A request made pursuant to subsection 1 must be submitted
on an application made available by the Department or a Class I
authorized third party and accompanied by the fee for the issuance
of a certificate of title.
3. A certificate of title in beneficiary form may not be issued to
a person who holds an interest in a motor vehicle, trailer or
semitrailer as a tenant in common with another person.
4. A certificate of title in beneficiary form must include after
the name of the owner or after the names of joint owners the words
“transfer on death to” or the abbreviation “TOD” followed by the
name of the beneficiary.
5. During the lifetime of a sole owner or before the death of the
last surviving joint owner:
(a) The signature or consent of the beneficiary is not required for
any transaction relating to a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer for
which a certificate of title in beneficiary form has been issued; and
(b) The certificate of title in beneficiary form may be revoked or
the beneficiary changed at any time by:
(1) Sale of the motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer with
proper assignment and delivery of the certificate of title to another
person; or
-
*SB243*

– 33 –
(2) Filing an application with, and paying a fee to, the
Department or a Class I authorized third party to reissue the
certificate of title with no designation of a beneficiary or with
the designation of a different beneficiary.
6. The interest of the beneficiary in a motor vehicle, trailer or
semitrailer on the death of the sole owner or on the death of the last
surviving joint owner is subject to any contract of sale, assignment
or ownership or security interest to which the owner or owners of
the motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer were subject during their
lifetime.
7. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
5, the designation of a beneficiary in a certificate of title in
beneficiary form may not be changed or revoked by will, any other
instrument or a change in circumstances, or otherwise changed or
revoked.
8. The Department or Class I authorized third party shall,
upon:
(a) Proof of death of one of the owners, of two or more joint
owners or of a sole owner;
(b) Surrender of the outstanding certificate of title in beneficiary
form; and
(c) Application and payment of the fee for a certificate of title,
 issue a new certificate of title for the motor vehicle, trailer or
semitrailer to the surviving owner or owners or, if none, to the
beneficiary, subject to any security interest.
9. For the purposes of complying with the provisions of
subsection 8, the Department or Class I authorized third party may
rely on a death certificate, record or report that constitutes prima
facie evidence of death.
10. The transfer on death of a motor vehicle, trailer or
semitrailer pursuant to this section is not considered as testamentary
and is not subject to administration pursuant to the provisions of
title 12 of NRS.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Beneficiary” means a person or persons designated to
become the owner or owners of a motor vehicle, trailer or
semitrailer on the death of the preceding owner or owners.
(b) “Certificate of title in beneficiary form” means a certificate
of title of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer that indicates the
present owner or owners of the motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer
and designates a beneficiary.
Sec. 35. NRS 482.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.260 1. When registering a vehicle, the Department and
its agents , a Class I authorized third party or a registered dealer
shall:
-
*SB243*

– 34 –
(a) Collect the fees for license plates and registration as
provided for in this chapter.
(b) Collect the governmental services tax on the vehicle, as
agent for the State and for the county where the applicant intends to
base the vehicle for the period of registration, unless the vehicle is
deemed to have no base.
(c) Collect the applicable taxes imposed pursuant to chapters
372, 374, 377 and 377A of NRS.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085, issue a
certificate of registration.
(e) If the registration is performed by the Department [,] or a
Class I authorized third party, issue the regular license plate or
plates.
(f) If the registration is performed by a registered dealer, provide
information to the owner regarding the manner in which the regular
license plate or plates will be made available to the owner.
2. Upon proof of ownership satisfactory to the Director or as
otherwise provided in NRS 482.2605, the Director shall cause to be
issued a certificate of title as provided in this chapter.
3. For the purposes of subsection 2, if a manufacturer described
in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 482.36349 operates one or
more of its fully autonomous vehicles for the purpose of providing
delivery services, the Director shall accept as proof of ownership the
manufacturer’s certificate of origin or the manufacturer’s statement
of origin issued for the fully autonomous vehicle. As used in this
paragraph, “fully autonomous vehicle” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 482A.036.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 371.070 and
subsections 7, 8 and 9, every vehicle being registered for the first
time in Nevada must be taxed for the purposes of the governmental
services tax for a 12-month period.
5. The Department shall deduct and withhold 2 percent of the
taxes collected pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 and remit
the remainder to the Department of Taxation.
6. A registered dealer and, except as otherwise provided in
section 9 of this act, a Class I authorized third party shall forward
all fees and taxes collected for the registration of vehicles to the
Department.
7. A trailer being registered pursuant to NRS 482.2065 must be
taxed for the purposes of the governmental services tax for a 3-year
period.
8. A full trailer or semitrailer being registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 must be taxed for the purposes of the
governmental services tax in the amount of $86. The governmental
-
*SB243*

– 35 –
services tax paid pursuant to this subsection is nontransferable and
nonrefundable.
9. A moped being registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155 must
be taxed for the purposes of the governmental services tax for only
the 12-month period following the registration. The governmental
services tax paid pursuant to this subsection is nontransferable and
nonrefundable.
Sec. 36. NRS 482.2605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2605 1. If an applicant who is seeking a certificate of
title to a vehicle from the Department or a Class I authorized third
party pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.240, subsection 2 of
NRS 482.260, subsection 1 of NRS 482.285 or subsection 1 of NRS
482.415 is unable to satisfy the Department or Class I authorized
third party that the applicant is entitled to a certificate of title
pursuant to those provisions, the applicant may obtain a new
certificate of title from the Department or a Class I authorized third
party by:
(a) Filing a bond with the Department that meets the
requirements of subsection 3;
(b) Allowing the Department or Class I authorized third party
to inspect the vehicle to verify the vehicle identification number and
identification numbers, if any, on parts used to repair the vehicle;
and
(c) Authorizing the Department or Class I authorized third
party to conduct a search of the history of the vehicle through any
national crime information system, including, without limitation,
the:
(1) National Crime Information Center, as defined in NRS
179A.061; and
(2) National Motor Vehicle Title Information System of the
United States Department of Justice.
2. Any person damaged by the issuance of a certificate of title
pursuant to this section has a right of action to recover on the bond
for any breach of its conditions, except the aggregate liability of the
surety to all persons must not exceed the amount of the bond. The
Department shall return the bond, and any deposit accompanying it,
3 years after the bond was filed with the Department, except that the
Department shall not return the bond if the Department has been
notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond.
3. The bond required pursuant to subsection 1 must be:
(a) In a form prescribed by the Department;
(b) Executed by the applicant as principal and by a corporation
qualified under the laws of this State as surety;
(c) In an amount equal to one and one-half times the value of the
vehicle, as determined by the Department; and
-
*SB243*

– 36 –
(d) Conditioned to indemnify any:
(1) Prior owner or lienholder of the vehicle, and his or her
successors in interest;
(2) Subsequent purchaser of the vehicle, and his or her
successors in interest; or
(3) Person acquiring a security interest in the vehicle, and his
or her successors in interest,
 against any expense, loss or damage because of the issuance of
the certificate of title or because of any defect in or undisclosed
security interest in the applicant’s right or title to the vehicle or the
applicant’s interest in the vehicle.
4. A right of action does not exist in favor of any person by
reason of any action or failure to act on the part of the Department
or any officer or employee thereof in carrying out the provisions of
this section, or in giving or failing to give any information
concerning the legal ownership of a vehicle or the existence of a
title obtained pursuant to this section.
5. An applicant seeking a certificate of title pursuant to this
section may participate in the electronic lien system authorized in
NRS 482.4285.
Sec. 37. NRS 482.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.265 1. The Department or Class I authorized third party
shall furnish to every owner whose vehicle is registered two license
plates for a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle or moped and one
license plate for all other vehicles required to be registered
hereunder. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085 and
482.2155, upon renewal of registration, the Department or Class I
authorized third party may issue one or more license plate stickers,
tabs or other suitable devices in lieu of new license plates.
2. The Director shall have the authority to require the return to
the Department of all number plates upon termination of the lawful
use thereof by the owner under this chapter.
3. Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, for the
issuance of each special license plate authorized pursuant to this
chapter:
(a) The fee to be received by the Department for the initial
issuance of the special license plate is $35, exclusive of any
additional fee which may be added to generate funds for a particular
cause or charitable organization;
(b) The fee to be received by the Department for the renewal of
the special license plate is $10, exclusive of any additional fee
which may be added to generate financial support for a particular
cause or charitable organization; and
(c) The Department shall not design, prepare or issue a special
license plate unless, within 4 years after the date on which the
-
*SB243*

– 37 –
measure authorizing the issuance becomes effective, it receives at
least 250 applications for the issuance of that plate.
4. The provisions of subsection 3 do not apply to
NRS 482.37901.
Sec. 38. NRS 482.2655 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2655 1. If, with respect to a motor vehicle that is
required to comply with the provisions of NRS 445B.700 to
445B.815, inclusive, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
an authorized inspection station or authorized station tests the
emissions from the motor vehicle and the motor vehicle fails the
emissions test, the Department or Class I authorized third party
shall not issue a special license plate for that vehicle pursuant to
NRS 482.381, 482.3812, 482.3814 or 482.3816 for a period of 90
days after the motor vehicle fails the emissions test.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Authorized inspection station” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 445B.710.
(b) “Authorized station” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 445B.720.
(c) “Fails the emissions test” means that a motor vehicle does
not comply with the applicable provisions of NRS 445B.700 to
445B.815, inclusive, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Sec. 39. NRS 482.266 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.266 1. A person who desires to have regular or
personalized license plates that are substantially in the same color
and form as license plates manufactured before January 1, 1982,
must:
(a) Submit a written request for such license plates to the
Department or a Class I authorized third party in a manner and
form prescribed by the Department; and
(b) In addition to all other applicable registration fees, licensing
fees and governmental services taxes, pay the manufacturing fee
prescribed by the Department.
 A person requesting license plates pursuant to this section must
comply with all requirements for registration and licensing pursuant
to this chapter. A request for license plates pursuant to this section
does not, by itself, constitute a request for special license plates
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.265.
2. After receiving a request and the full amount of the payment
due for license plates requested pursuant to subsection 1, the
Department shall manufacture the license plates using substantially
the same process, dies and materials as were used to manufacture
license plates before January 1, 1982. The Department or the Class
I authorized third party shall deliver license plates requested
pursuant to this section to a person who requests such license plates
-
*SB243*

– 38 –
within 180 days after acceptance of the written request or after
receipt of payment therefor, whichever occurs last.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Prescribe, by regulation, a manner and form for submitting a
written request pursuant to subsection 1. The form must include,
without limitation, an indication of whether the requester desires to
have the same letters and numbers on the license plates requested as
are on the license plates that are registered to the requester at the
time of the request.
(b) Determine the cost of manufacturing a license plate pursuant
to this section and prescribe a manufacturing fee, which must not
exceed $25, to defray the cost of manufacturing license plates
pursuant to this section. The manufacturing fee must be:
(1) Collected by the Department [;] or a Class I authorized
third party;
(2) Deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the
State Highway Fund; and
(3) Allocated to the Revolving Account for the Issuance of
Special License Plates created pursuant to NRS 482.1805 to defray
the costs of manufacturing license plates pursuant to this section.
4. A person who requests license plates pursuant to this section
may keep the license plates which are registered to him or her at the
time of the request if the license plates requested contain the same
letters and numbers as the license plates which are registered to the
person at the time of the request.
Sec. 40. NRS 482.268 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.268 1. In addition to any other applicable fee, there must
be paid to the Department or a Class I authorized third party for
each license plate issued for a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer, to
defray the cost of producing the license plate:
(a) A fee of 50 cents which must be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Fund for Prison Industries; and
(b) Such fee as may be determined by regulation of the
Department, which must be deposited with the State Treasurer for
credit to the License Plate Production Account.
2. The License Plate Production Account is hereby created in
the State Highway Fund. The Account is a continuing account
without reversion. Interest and income earned on money in the
Account must be credited to the Account. The money in the
Account must be used only to defray the cost of producing license
plates, as described in subsection 1.
Sec. 41. NRS 482.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.270 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section or by
specific statute, the Director shall order the redesign and preparation
of motor vehicle license plates.
-
*SB243*

– 39 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
Department or a Class I authorized third party may, upon the
payment of all applicable fees, issue redesigned motor vehicle
license plates.
3. The Department shall not issue redesigned motor vehicle
license plates pursuant to this section to a person who was issued
motor vehicle license plates before January 1, 1982, or pursuant to
NRS 482.2155, 482.3747, 482.3763, 482.3783, 482.379 or
482.37901, without the approval of the person.
4. The Director may determine and vary the size, shape and
form and the material of which license plates are made, but each
license plate must be of sufficient size to be plainly readable from a
distance of 100 feet during daylight. All license plates must be
treated to reflect light and to be at least 100 times brighter than
conventional painted number plates. When properly mounted on an
unlighted vehicle, the license plates, when viewed from a vehicle
equipped with standard headlights, must be visible for a distance of
not less than 1,500 feet and readable for a distance of not less than
110 feet.
5. Every license plate must have displayed upon it:
(a) The registration number, or combination of letters and
numbers, assigned to the vehicle and to the owner thereof;
(b) The name of this State, which may be abbreviated;
(c) If issued for a calendar year, the year; and
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085, if issued for
a registration period other than a calendar year, the month and year
the registration expires.
Sec. 42. NRS 482.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.275 1. The license plates for a motor vehicle other than a
motorcycle, moped or motor vehicle being transported by a licensed
vehicle transporter must be attached thereto, one in the rear and,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, one in the front. The
license plate issued for all other vehicles required to be registered
must be attached to the rear of the vehicle. The license plates must
be so displayed during the current calendar year or registration
period.
2. If the motor vehicle was not manufactured to include a
bracket, device or other contrivance to display and secure a front
license plate, and if the manufacturer of the motor vehicle provided
no other means or method by which a front license plate may be
displayed upon and secured to the motor vehicle:
(a) One license plate must be attached to the motor vehicle in
the rear; and
(b) The other license plate may, at the option of the owner of the
vehicle, be attached to the motor vehicle in the front.
-
*SB243*

– 40 –
3. The provisions of subsection 2 do not relieve the
Department or a Class I authorized third party of the duty to issue
a set of two license plates as otherwise required pursuant to NRS
482.265 or other applicable law and do not entitle the owner of a
motor vehicle to pay a reduced tax or fee in connection with the
registration or transfer of the motor vehicle. If the owner of a motor
vehicle, in accordance with the provisions of subsection 2, exercises
the option to attach a license plate only to the rear of the motor
vehicle, the owner shall:
(a) Retain the other license plate; and
(b) Insofar as it may be practicable, return or surrender both
plates to the Department as a set when required by law to do so.
4. Every license plate must at all times be securely fastened to
the vehicle to which it is assigned so as to prevent the plate from
swinging and at a height not less than 12 inches from the ground,
measuring from the bottom of such plate, in a place and position to
be clearly visible, and must be maintained free from foreign
materials and in a condition to be clearly legible.
5. Any license plate which is issued to a vehicle transporter or
a dealer, rebuilder or manufacturer may be attached to a vehicle
owned or controlled by that person by a secure means. No license
plate may be displayed loosely in the window or by any other
unsecured method in any motor vehicle.
Sec. 43. NRS 482.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.280 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155,
the registration of every vehicle expires at midnight on the day
specified on the receipt of registration, unless the day specified falls
on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. If the day specified on the
receipt of registration is a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, the
registration of the vehicle expires at midnight on the next judicial
day. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085, the
Department shall mail to each holder of a certificate of registration a
notification for renewal of registration for the following period of
registration. The notifications must be mailed by the Department in
sufficient time to allow all applicants to mail the notifications to the
Department or to renew the certificate of registration with an
authorized third party, at a kiosk or authorized inspection station or
via the Internet or an interactive response system and to receive new
certificates of registration and license plates, stickers, tabs or other
suitable devices by mail before the expiration of their registrations.
An applicant may present or submit the notification to a Class I
authorized third party or any agent or office of the Department.
2. A notification:
-
*SB243*

– 41 –
(a) Mailed or presented to the Department , a Class I authorized
third party or [to] a county assessor pursuant to the provisions of
this section;
(b) Submitted to the Department pursuant to NRS 482.294; or
(c) Presented to an authorized inspection station or authorized
station pursuant to the provisions of NRS 482.281,
 must include, if required, evidence of compliance with standards
for the control of emissions.
3. The Department shall include with each notification mailed
pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The amount of the governmental services tax to be collected
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 482.260.
(b) The amount set forth in a notice of nonpayment filed with
the Department by a local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527.
(c) A statement which informs the applicant:
(1) That, pursuant to NRS 485.185, the applicant is legally
required to maintain insurance during the period in which the motor
vehicle is registered which must be provided by an insurance
company licensed by the Division of Insurance of the Department of
Business and Industry and approved to do business in this State; and
(2) Of any other applicable requirements set forth in chapter
485 of NRS and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(d) A statement which informs the applicant that, if the applicant
is required to report the mileage or any other information required
by the Department pursuant to NRS 482.2177, the applicant must
submit to the Department or Class I authorized third party the
mileage shown on the odometer of the vehicle at the time of
application for renewal and any other information required by the
Department.
(e) A statement which informs the applicant that, if the applicant
renews a certificate of registration with a Class I authorized third
party, at a kiosk or via the Internet, he or she may make a
nonrefundable monetary contribution of $2 for each vehicle
registration renewed for the Complete Streets Program, if any,
created pursuant to NRS 244.2643, 277A.285 or 403.575, as
applicable, based on the declaration made pursuant to paragraph (c)
of subsection 3 of NRS 482.215. The notification must state in a
clear and conspicuous manner that a contribution for a Complete
Streets Program is nonrefundable and voluntary and is in addition to
any fees required for registration.
4. An application for renewal of a certificate of registration
submitted at a kiosk or via the Internet must include a statement
which informs the applicant that he or she may make a
nonrefundable monetary contribution of $2, for each vehicle
registration which is renewed at a kiosk or via the Internet, for the
-
*SB243*

– 42 –
Complete Streets Program, if any, created pursuant to NRS
244.2643, 277A.285 or 403.575, as applicable, based on the
declaration made pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of NRS
482.215. The application must state in a clear and conspicuous
manner that a contribution for a Complete Streets Program is
nonrefundable and voluntary and is in addition to any fees required
for registration, and must include a method by which the applicant
must indicate his or her intention to opt in or opt out of making such
a contribution.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2918, an owner
who has made proper application for renewal of registration before
the expiration of the current registration but who has not received
the license plate or plates or card of registration for the ensuing
period of registration is entitled to operate or permit the operation of
that vehicle upon the highways upon displaying thereon the license
plate or plates issued for the preceding period of registration for
such a time as may be prescribed by the Department as it may find
necessary for the issuance of the new plate or plates or card of
registration.
Sec. 44. NRS 482.2805 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2805 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a Class I authorized third
party shall not renew the registration of a motor vehicle if a local
authority has filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles a notice
of nonpayment pursuant to NRS 484B.527, or if the Department of
Transportation or a private partner under a public-private
partnership has filed a notice of nonpayment pursuant to section 42
of the Boulder City Bypass Toll Road Demonstration Project Act,
unless, at the time for renewal of the registration, the registered
owner of the motor vehicle provides to the Department of Motor
Vehicles or a Class I authorized third party a receipt issued by the
local authority pursuant to NRS 482.2807, or a receipt issued by the
Department of Transportation or a private partner under a public-
private partnership.
2. If the registered owner provides a receipt to the Department
of Motor Vehicles or a Class I authorized third party pursuant to
subsection 1 and complies with the other requirements of this
chapter, the Department of Motor Vehicles or Class I authorized
third party shall renew the registration of the motor vehicle.
3. The Department of Motor Vehicles or a Class I authorized
third party shall renew the registration of a motor vehicle owned by
a short-term lessor for which the Department of Motor Vehicles or a
Class I authorized third party has received a notice of nonpayment
pursuant to NRS 484B.527 or section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass
Toll Road Demonstration Project Act without requiring the short-
-
*SB243*

– 43 –
term lessor to provide a receipt pursuant to subsection 1 if the short-
term lessor submits to the Department of Motor Vehicles or a Class
I authorized third party a certificate issued by a local authority, the
Department of Transportation or a private partner under a public-
private partnership pursuant to subsection 4.
4. A local authority, the Department of Transportation or a
private partner under a public-private partnership shall, upon
request, issue to a short-term lessor a certificate which requires the
Department of Motor Vehicles or a Class I authorized third party
to renew the registration of a motor vehicle owned by the short-term
lessor without requiring the short-term lessor to provide a receipt
pursuant to subsection 1 if the short-term lessor provides the local
authority, the Department of Transportation or a private partner
under a public-private partnership with the name, address and
number of the driver’s license of the short-term lessee who was
leasing the vehicle at the time of the violation.
5. Upon the request of the registered owner of a motor vehicle,
the Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide a copy of the notice
of nonpayment filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles by the
local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527 or the Department of
Transportation or a private partner under a public-private
partnership pursuant to section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass Toll
Road Demonstration Project Act.
6. If the registration of a motor vehicle that is identified in a
notice of nonpayment filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles
by a local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527 or the Department of
Transportation or a private partner under a public-private
partnership pursuant to section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass Toll
Road Demonstration Project Act is not renewed for two consecutive
periods of registration, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall
delete any records maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles
concerning that notice.
7. The Department of Motor Vehicles may require a local
authority to pay a fee for the creation, maintenance or revision of a
record of the Department of Motor Vehicles concerning a notice of
nonpayment filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles by the
local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527. The Department of
Motor Vehicles may require the Department of Transportation or a
private partner under a public-private partnership to pay a fee for the
creation, maintenance or revision of a record of the Department of
Motor Vehicles concerning a notice of nonpayment filed with the
Department of Motor Vehicles by the Department of Transportation
or a private partner under a public-private partnership pursuant to
section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass Toll Road Demonstration
Project Act. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, by regulation,
-
*SB243*

– 44 –
establish any fee required by this subsection. Any fees collected by
the Department pursuant to this subsection must be:
(a) Deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor
Vehicle Fund; and
(b) Allocated to the Department to defray the cost of carrying
out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 45. NRS 482.283 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.283 Each holder of a valid registration, upon changing his
or her name or place of residence, shall notify the Department or a
Class I authorized third party of the change within 30 days after the
change and shall include in the notice both the old and new names
and residence addresses.
Sec. 46. NRS 482.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.285 1. If any certificate of registration or certificate of
title is lost, mutilated or illegible, the person to whom it was issued
shall immediately make application for and obtain a duplicate or
substitute therefor upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
Department or a Class I authorized third party and upon payment
of the required fees. An applicant who is unable to furnish
information satisfactory to the Department or a Class I authorized
third party that the applicant is entitled to a duplicate or substitute
certificate of title pursuant to this subsection may obtain a new
certificate of title pursuant to the provisions of NRS 482.2605.
2. If any license plate or plates or any decal is lost, mutilated or
illegible, the person to whom it was issued shall immediately make
application for and obtain:
(a) A duplicate number plate or a substitute number plate;
(b) A substitute decal; or
(c) A combination of both (a) and (b),
 as appropriate, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
Department or a Class I authorized third party and payment of the
fees required by NRS 482.500.
3. If any license plate or plates or any decal is stolen, the
person to whom it was issued shall immediately make application
for and obtain:
(a) A substitute number plate;
(b) A substitute decal; or
(c) A combination of both (a) and (b),
 as appropriate, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
Department or a Class I authorized third party and payment of the
fees required by NRS 482.500.
4. The Department or a Class I authorized third party shall
issue duplicate number plates or substitute number plates and, if
applicable, a substitute decal, if the applicant:
-
*SB243*

– 45 –
(a) Returns the mutilated or illegible plates to the Department or
a Class I authorized third party or signs a declaration that the plates
were lost, mutilated or illegible; and
(b) Complies with the provisions of subsection 6.
5. The Department or a Class I authorized third party shall
issue substitute number plates and, if applicable, a substitute decal,
if the applicant:
(a) Signs a declaration that the plates were stolen; and
(b) Complies with the provisions of subsection 6.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an applicant
who desires duplicate number plates or substitute number plates
must make application for renewal of registration. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 8 or 9 of NRS 482.260, credit
must be allowed for the portion of the registration fee and
governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of the
current registration period. In lieu of making application for renewal
of registration, an applicant may elect to make application solely
for:
(a) Duplicate number plates or substitute number plates, and a
substitute decal, if the previous license plates were lost, mutilated or
illegible; or
(b) Substitute number plates and a substitute decal, if the
previous license plates were stolen.
7. An applicant who makes the election described in subsection
6 retains the current date of expiration for the registration of the
applicable vehicle and is not, as a prerequisite to receiving duplicate
number plates or substitute number plates or a substitute decal,
required to:
(a) Submit evidence of compliance with controls over emission;
or
(b) Pay the registration fee and governmental services tax
attributable to a full period of registration.
Sec. 47. NRS 482.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.295 The Department , [or] a registered dealer or a Class I
authorized third party shall not register a vehicle intended to be
leased by a short-term lessor until the owner demonstrates to the
Department the owner’s financial ability to respond to damages by
providing evidence of insurance as that term is defined in
NRS 485.034.
Sec. 48. NRS 482.385 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.385 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and
7 and NRS 482.390 and 482.3961, a nonresident owner of a vehicle
of a type subject to registration pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter, owning any vehicle which has been registered for the
current year in the state, country or other place of which the owner
-
*SB243*

– 46 –
is a resident and which at all times when operated in this State has
displayed upon it the registration license plate issued for the vehicle
in the place of residence of the owner, may operate or permit the
operation of the vehicle within this State without its registration in
this State pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and without the
payment of any registration fees to this State:
(a) For a period of not more than 30 days in the aggregate in any
1 calendar year; and
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a), during any
period in which the owner is:
(1) On active duty in the military service of the United
States;
(2) An out-of-state student;
(3) Registered as a student at a college or university located
outside this State and who is in the State for a period of not more
than 6 months to participate in a work-study program for which the
student earns academic credits from the college or university; or
(4) A migrant or seasonal farm worker.
2. This section does not:
(a) Prohibit the use of manufacturers’, distributors’ or dealers’
license plates issued by any state or country by any nonresident in
the operation of any vehicle on the public highways of this State.
(b) Require registration of vehicles of a type subject to
registration pursuant to the provisions of this chapter operated by
nonresident common motor carriers of persons or property, contract
motor carriers of persons or property, or private motor carriers of
property as stated in NRS 482.390.
(c) Require registration of a vehicle operated by a border state
employee.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, when a
person, formerly a nonresident, becomes a resident of this State, the
person shall:
(a) Within 30 days after becoming a resident; or
(b) At the time he or she obtains a driver’s license,
 whichever occurs earlier, apply for the registration of each
vehicle the person owns which is operated in this State. When a
person, formerly a nonresident, applies for a driver’s license in this
State, the Department shall inform the person of the requirements
imposed by this subsection and of the penalties that may be imposed
for failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection.
4. A citation may be issued pursuant to subsection 1, 3 or 5
only if the violation is discovered when the vehicle is halted or its
driver arrested for another alleged violation or offense. The
Department shall maintain or cause to be maintained a list or other
record of persons who fail to comply with the provisions of
-
*SB243*

– 47 –
subsection 3 and shall [, at least once each month,] provide a copy
of that list or record to [the] :
(a) Every Class I authorized third party at least once each day;
and
(b) The Department of Public Safety [.] at least once each
month.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
482.3961, a resident or nonresident owner of a vehicle of a type
subject to registration pursuant to the provisions of this chapter who
engages in a trade, profession or occupation or accepts gainful
employment in this State or who enrolls his or her children in a
public school in this State shall, within 30 days after the
commencement of such employment or enrollment, apply for the
registration of each vehicle the person owns which is operated in
this State. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a
nonresident who is:
(a) On active duty in the military service of the United States;
(b) An out-of-state student;
(c) Registered as a student at a college or university located
outside this State and who is in the State for a period of not more
than 6 months to participate in a work-study program for which the
student earns academic credits from the college or university; or
(d) A migrant or seasonal farm worker.
6. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1, 3 or 5
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, shall be punished by a fine of $1,000. The fine imposed
pursuant to this subsection is in addition to any fine or penalty
imposed for the other alleged violation or offense for which the
vehicle was halted or its driver arrested pursuant to subsection 4.
The fine imposed pursuant to this subsection may be reduced to not
less than $200 if the person presents evidence at the time of the
hearing that the person has registered the vehicle pursuant to this
chapter.
7. Any resident operating upon a highway of this State a motor
vehicle which is owned by a nonresident and which is furnished to
the resident operator for his or her continuous use within this State,
shall cause that vehicle to be registered within 30 days after
beginning its operation within this State.
8. A person registering a vehicle pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 1, 3, 5, 7 or 9 or pursuant to NRS 482.390:
(a) Must be assessed the registration fees and governmental
services tax, as required by the provisions of this chapter and
chapter 371 of NRS; and
(b) Must not be allowed credit on those taxes and fees for the
unused months of the previous registration.
-
*SB243*

– 48 –
9. If a vehicle is used in this State for a gainful purpose, the
owner shall immediately apply to the Department or a Class I
authorized third party for registration, except as otherwise provided
in NRS 482.390, 482.395, 482.3961 and 706.801 to 706.861,
inclusive.
10. An owner registering a vehicle pursuant to the provisions
of this section shall surrender the existing nonresident license plates
and registration certificates to the Department or Class I authorized
third party for cancellation.
11. A vehicle may be cited for a violation of this section
regardless of whether it is in operation or is parked on a highway, in
a public parking lot or on private property which is open to the
public if, after communicating with the owner or operator of the
vehicle, the peace officer issuing the citation determines that:
(a) The owner of the vehicle is a resident of this State;
(b) The vehicle is used in this State for a gainful purpose;
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1, the owner of the vehicle is a nonresident and has operated the
vehicle in this State for more than 30 days in the aggregate in any 1
calendar year; or
(d) The owner of the vehicle is a nonresident required to register
the vehicle pursuant to subsection 5.
12. A constable may issue a citation for a violation of this
section only if the vehicle is located in his or her township at the
time the citation is issued.
13. As used in this section, “peace officer” includes a
constable.
Sec. 49. NRS 482.396 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.396 1. A person who is not a dealer, manufacturer or
rebuilder may apply to the Department or a Class I authorized third
party for a permit to operate a vehicle which:
(a) Is not subject to the provisions of NRS 482.390, 482.395 and
706.801 to 706.861, inclusive; and
(b) Is not currently registered in this State, another state or a
foreign country, or has been purchased by the applicant from a
person who is not a dealer.
2. The Department shall adopt regulations imposing a fee for
the issuance of the permit.
3. Each permit must:
(a) Bear the date of expiration in numerals of sufficient size to
be plainly readable from a reasonable distance during daylight;
(b) Expire at 5 p.m. not more than 60 days after its date of
issuance;
(c) Be affixed to the vehicle in the manner prescribed by the
Department; and
-
*SB243*

– 49 –
(d) Be removed and destroyed upon its expiration or the
issuance of a new permit or a certificate of registration for the
vehicle, whichever occurs first.
4. The Department or a Class I authorized third party may
authorize the issuance of more than one permit for the vehicle to be
operated by the applicant.
5. A person who is not a dealer, manufacturer or rebuilder who
purchased a vehicle described in subsection 1 may move the vehicle
without being issued a permit pursuant to this section for 3 days
after the date of purchase if the person carries in the vehicle:
(a) Proof of ownership or proof of purchase; and
(b) Proof of liability insurance.
Sec. 50. NRS 482.399 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.399 1. Upon the transfer of the ownership of or interest
in any vehicle by any holder of a valid registration, or upon
destruction of the vehicle, the registration expires.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, the holder of the original registration
may transfer the registration to another vehicle to be registered by
the holder and use the same regular license plate or plates or special
license plate or plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to
482.3823, inclusive, or 482.384, on the vehicle from which the
registration is being transferred, if the license plate or plates are
appropriate for the second vehicle, upon filing an application for
transfer of registration and upon paying the transfer registration fee
and the excess, if any, of the registration fee and governmental
services tax on the vehicle to which the registration is transferred
over the total registration fee and governmental services tax paid on
all vehicles from which he or she is transferring ownership or
interest. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.294, an
application for transfer of registration must be made in person, if
practicable, to any office or agent of the Department , to a Class I
authorized third party or to a registered dealer, and the license plate
or plates may not be used upon a second vehicle until registration of
that vehicle is complete.
3. In computing the governmental services tax, the
Department, its agent , [or] the registered dealer or the Class I
authorized third party, as applicable, shall credit the portion of the
tax paid on the first vehicle attributable to the remainder of the
current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the second vehicle or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner. If any person
transfers ownership or interest in two or more vehicles, the
Department , [or] the registered dealer or the Class I authorized
third party, as applicable, shall credit the portion of the tax paid on
-
*SB243*

– 50 –
all of the vehicles attributable to the remainder of the current
registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly basis
against the tax due on the vehicle to which the registration is
transferred or on any other vehicle of which the person is the
registered owner. The certificates of registration and unused license
plates of the vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest must be submitted before credit is given against the tax due
on the vehicle to which the registration is transferred or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner.
4. In computing the registration fee, the Department or its
agent , [or] the registered dealer or the Class I authorized third
party, as applicable, shall credit the portion of the registration fee
paid on each vehicle attributable to the remainder of the current
calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis against the
registration fee due on the vehicle to which registration is
transferred.
5. If the amount owed on the registration fee or governmental
services tax on the vehicle to which registration is transferred is less
than the credit on the total registration fee or governmental services
tax paid on all vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest, the person may apply the unused portion of the credit to the
registration of any other vehicle owned by the person. Any unused
portion of such a credit expires on the date the registration of the
vehicle from which the person transferred the registration was due
to expire.
6. If the license plate or plates are not appropriate for the
second vehicle, the plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department , [or] registered dealer or Class I authorized third party
and an appropriate plate or plates must be issued by the Department
[.] or the Class I authorized third party. The Department shall not
reissue the surrendered plate or plates until the next succeeding
licensing period.
7. If application for transfer of registration is not made within
60 days after the destruction or transfer of ownership of or interest
in any vehicle, the license plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department on or before the 60th day for cancellation of the
registration.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
371.040, NRS 482.2155, subsections 8 and 9 of NRS 482.260 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, if a person cancels his or her
registration and surrenders to the Department or a Class I
authorized third party the license plates for a vehicle, the
Department shall:
(a) In accordance with the provisions of subsection 9, issue to
the person a refund of the portion of the registration fee and
-
*SB243*

– 51 –
governmental services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the
remainder of the current calendar year or registration period on a pro
rata basis; or
(b) If the person does not qualify for a refund in accordance with
the provisions of subsection 9, issue to the person a credit in the
amount of the portion of the registration fee and governmental
services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the remainder of the
current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis. Such
a credit may be applied by the person to the registration of any other
vehicle owned by the person. Any unused portion of the credit
expires on the date the registration of the vehicle from which the
person obtained a refund was due to expire.
9. The Department shall issue a refund pursuant to subsection 8
only if the request for a refund is made at the time the registration is
cancelled and the license plates are surrendered, the person
requesting the refund is a resident of Nevada, the amount eligible
for refund exceeds $100, and evidence satisfactory to the
Department is submitted that reasonably proves the existence of
extenuating circumstances. For the purposes of this subsection, the
term “extenuating circumstances” means circumstances wherein:
(a) The person has recently relinquished his or her driver’s
license and has sold or otherwise disposed of his or her vehicle.
(b) The vehicle has been determined to be inoperable and the
person does not transfer the registration to a different vehicle.
(c) The owner of the vehicle is seriously ill or has died and the
guardians or survivors have sold or otherwise disposed of the
vehicle.
(d) Any other event occurs which the Department, by regulation,
has defined to constitute an “extenuating circumstance” for the
purposes of this subsection.
Sec. 51. NRS 482.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.410 The transferee of a vehicle shall apply for a certificate
of registration and pay the governmental services tax to the deputy
registrar of motor vehicles in any county of this State [,] or to a
Class I authorized third party in the manner provided in this
chapter for an original registration.
Sec. 52. NRS 482.426 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.426 When a used or rebuilt vehicle is sold in this State by
a person who is not a dealer or rebuilder, the seller or buyer or both
of them shall, within 10 days after the sale:
1. Submit to the Department [:] or a Class I authorized third
party:
(a) If a certificate of title has been issued in this State, the
certificate properly endorsed.
-
*SB243*

– 52 –
(b) If a certificate of title or other document of title has been
issued by a public authority of another state, territory or country:
(1) The certificate or document properly endorsed; and
(2) A statement containing, if not included in the endorsed
certificate or document, the description of the vehicle, including
whether it is a rebuilt vehicle, the names and addresses of the buyer
and seller, and the name and address of any person who takes or
retains a purchase money security interest. Any such statement must
be signed and acknowledged by the seller and the buyer.
(c) If no document of title has been issued by any public
authority, a statement containing all the information and signed and
acknowledged in the manner required by subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (b).
2. Remit to the Department or the Class I authorized third
party the fee set forth in NRS 482.429 for the processing of an
endorsed certificate of title or statement submitted to the
Department or Class I authorized third party pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 53. NRS 482.427 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.427 1. Upon receipt of the documents required
respectively by NRS 482.423, 482.424 and 482.426 to be submitted
to it, and the payment of all required fees, the Department or the
Class I authorized third party shall issue a certificate of title.
2. If no security interest is created or exists in connection with
the sale, the certificate of title must be issued to the buyer.
3. If a security interest is created by the sale, the certificate of
title must be issued to the secured party or to his or her assignee.
Sec. 54. NRS 482.429 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.429 1. For its services under this chapter, the Department
shall adopt regulations specifying the amount of the fees which the
Department or a Class I authorized third party will charge and
collect:
(a) For each certificate of title issued for a vehicle present or
registered in this State.
(b) For each duplicate certificate of title issued.
(c) For each certificate of title issued for a vehicle not present in
or registered in this State.
(d) For expedited processing of a certificate of title issued
pursuant to paragraph (a), (b) or (c).
(e) For expedited mailing of a certificate of title issued pursuant
to paragraph (a), (b) or (c), that does not include prepaid postage.
(f) For the processing of each dealer’s or rebuilder’s report of
sale submitted to the Department.
(g) For the processing of each long-term lessor’s report of lease
submitted to the Department.
-
*SB243*

– 53 –
(h) For the processing of each endorsed certificate of title or
statement submitted to the Department or a Class I authorized third
party upon the sale of a used or rebuilt vehicle in this State by a
person who is not a dealer or rebuilder.
2. Any fee paid pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (e) of
subsection 1 must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to
the Motor Vehicle Fund and allocated to the Department to defray
the costs of processing and mailing certificates of title.
Sec. 55. NRS 484B.527 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.527 1. If the registered owner of a motor vehicle fails
to pay any civil penalty or criminal fine or any other charge imposed
against the registered owner for a violation of:
(a) The provisions of NRS 484B.440 to 484B.523, inclusive; or
(b) An ordinance of a local authority authorized by chapters
484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS which covers the same subject
matter as the provisions of NRS 484B.440 to 484B.523, inclusive,
 the local authority which imposed that penalty, fine or charge
may file a notice of nonpayment with the Department.
2. The notice must include:
(a) The time, place and date of each violation;
(b) The number of the license plate of the vehicle and the make
and model year of the vehicle;
(c) The amount of the fine and any other charge imposed for
each violation;
(d) The total amount of money owed to the local authority for
those violations; and
(e) Any other information the Department may require.
3. The Department shall forward to each Class I authorized
third party a list of vehicles and license plates for which a notice
has been received by the Department pursuant to this section.
4. The Department shall adopt regulations which prescribe the
form for the notice of nonpayment and any information which must
be included in that notice.
Sec. 56. NRS 487.810 is hereby amended to read as follows:
487.810 1. The state agency or a Class I authorized third
party may issue a salvage title for a vehicle, which contains a brief
description of the vehicle, including, insofar as data may exist with
respect to the vehicle, the make, type, serial number and motor
number, or any other number of the vehicle, upon application, to:
(a) The owner of the vehicle;
(b) The person to whom the vehicle is titled;
(c) An insurance company that acquires the vehicle as a salvage
vehicle pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 487.800;
(d) A lienholder who acquires title to the vehicle;
-
*SB243*

– 54 –
(e) A salvage pool who acquires the vehicle pursuant to
subsection 10 of NRS 487.800; or
(f) An organization that acquires the vehicle pursuant to
subsection 11 of NRS 487.800.
2. A properly endorsed title, together with a disclosure of
mileage, as required pursuant to the provisions of 49 U.S.C. §§
32701 et seq. and 49 C.F.R. § 580.5, must be submitted with the
application for salvage title.
3. Within 2 days after receiving all necessary documents, the
state agency or Class I authorized third party shall issue a salvage
title for the vehicle.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state
agency or Class I authorized third party shall charge and collect a
fee of $10 for the issuance of a salvage title pursuant to this section.
The state agency or Class I authorized third party shall not charge a
fee for the issuance of a salvage title to an automobile wrecker
licensed in this State. Fees collected by the state agency or Class I
authorized third party pursuant to this subsection must be deposited
with the State Treasurer for credit to the Revolving Account for the
Issuance of Salvage Titles created by NRS 487.825.
5. Ownership interest in a salvage vehicle may not be
transferred unless a salvage title has been issued by the state agency
for the vehicle.
6. Possession of a salvage title does not entitle a person to
dismantle, scrap, process or wreck any vehicle in this State unless
the person holds a license issued pursuant to NRS 487.050.
7. The Department or a Class I authorized third party shall not
issue a salvage title for a nonrepairable vehicle.
Sec. 57. NRS 487.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
487.820 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, 10
or 11 of NRS 487.800, if the applicant for a salvage title is unable to
furnish the certificates of title and registration last issued for the
vehicle, the state agency or Class I authorized third party may
accept the application, examine the circumstances of the case and
require the filing of suitable affidavits or other information or
documents. If satisfied that the applicant is entitled to a salvage title,
the state agency or Class I authorized third party may issue the
salvage title.
2. No duplicate certificate of title or registration may be issued
when a salvage title is applied for, and no fees are required for the
affidavits of any stolen, lost or damaged certificate, or duplicates
thereof, unless the vehicle is subsequently registered.
3. If an applicant is unable to satisfy the state agency or Class I
authorized third party that the applicant is entitled to a salvage title
-
*SB243*

– 55 –
pursuant to subsection 1, the applicant may obtain a salvage title
from the state agency or Class I authorized third party by:
(a) Filing a bond with the state agency that meets the
requirements of subsection 5;
(b) Allowing the state agency or Class I authorized third party
to inspect the vehicle to verify the vehicle identification number and
the identification numbers, if any, for parts used to repair the
vehicle; and
(c) Authorizing the state agency or Class I authorized third
party to conduct a search through any national crime information
system, including, without limitation, the:
(1) National Crime Information Center, as defined in NRS
179A.061; and
(2) National Motor Vehicle Title Information System of the
United States Department of Justice.
4. Any person damaged by the issuance of the salvage title
pursuant to subsection 3 has a right of action to recover on the bond
for any breach of its conditions, except the aggregate liability of the
surety to all persons must not exceed the amount of the bond. The
state agency shall return the bond, and any deposit accompanying it,
3 years after the bond was filed with the state agency, except that
the state agency must not return the bond if the state agency has
been notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond.
5. The bond required pursuant to subsection 3 must be:
(a) In a form prescribed by the state agency;
(b) Executed by the applicant as principal and by a corporation
qualified under the laws of this State as surety;
(c) In an amount equal to 25 percent of the value of the vehicle,
as determined by the state agency; and
(d) Conditioned to indemnify any:
(1) Prior owner or lienholder of the vehicle, and his or her
successors in interest;
(2) Subsequent purchaser of the vehicle, and his or her
successors in interest; or
(3) Person acquiring a security interest in the vehicle, and his
or her successors in interest,
 against any expense, loss or damage because of the issuance of
the salvage title or because of any defect in or undisclosed security
interest in the applicant’s right or title to the vehicle or the
applicant’s interest in the vehicle.
6. A right of action does not exist in favor of any person by
reason of any action or failure to act on the part of the state agency
or any officer or employee thereof in carrying out the provisions of
subsections 3, 4 and 5, or in giving or failing to give any
-
*SB243*

– 56 –
information concerning the legal ownership of a vehicle or the
existence of a salvage title obtained pursuant to subsection 3.
Sec. 58. NRS 490.082 is hereby amended to read as follows:
490.082 1. An owner of an off-highway vehicle that is
acquired:
(a) Before July 1, 2011:
(1) May apply for, to the Department by mail or to an
authorized dealer [,] or a Class I authorized third party, and obtain
from the Department [,] or a Class I authorized third party, a
certificate of title for the off-highway vehicle.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall,
within 1 year after July 1, 2011, apply for, to the Department by
mail or to an authorized dealer [,] or a Class I authorized third
party, and obtain from the Department [,] or a Class I authorized
third party, the registration of the off-highway vehicle.
(b) On or after July 1, 2011, shall, within 30 days after acquiring
ownership of the off-highway vehicle:
(1) Apply for, to the Department by mail or to an authorized
dealer [,] or a Class I authorized third party, and obtain from the
Department [,] or a Class I authorized third party, a certificate of
title for the off-highway vehicle.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, apply for,
to the Department by mail or to an authorized dealer [,] or a Class I
authorized third party, and obtain from the Department [,] or a
Class I authorized third party, the registration of the off-highway
vehicle pursuant to this section or NRS 490.0825.
2. If an owner of an off-highway vehicle applies to the
Department , [or to] an authorized dealer or the Class I authorized
third party for:
(a) A certificate of title for the off-highway vehicle, the owner
shall submit to the Department , [or to] the authorized dealer or the
Class I authorized third party proof prescribed by the Department
that he or she is the owner of the off-highway vehicle.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 490.0825, the
registration of the off-highway vehicle, the owner shall submit:
(1) If ownership of the off-highway vehicle was obtained
before July 1, 2011, proof prescribed by the Department:
(I) That he or she is the owner of the off-highway vehicle;
and
(II) Of the unique vehicle identification number, serial
number or distinguishing number obtained pursuant to NRS
490.0835 for the off-highway vehicle; or
(2) If ownership of the off-highway vehicle was obtained on
or after July 1, 2011:
-
*SB243*

– 57 –
(I) Evidence satisfactory to the Department or Class I
authorized third party that he or she has paid all taxes applicable in
this State relating to the purchase of the off-highway vehicle, or
submit an affidavit indicating that he or she purchased the vehicle
through a private party sale and no tax is due relating to the
purchase of the off-highway vehicle; and
(II) Proof prescribed by the Department that he or she is
the owner of the off-highway vehicle and of the unique vehicle
identification number, serial number or distinguishing number
obtained pursuant to NRS 490.0835 for the off-highway vehicle.
3. Registration of an off-highway vehicle is not required if the
off-highway vehicle:
(a) Is owned and operated by:
(1) A federal agency;
(2) An agency of this State; or
(3) A county, incorporated city or unincorporated town in
this State;
(b) Is part of the inventory of a dealer of off-highway vehicles
and is affixed with a special plate provided to the off-highway
vehicle dealer pursuant to NRS 490.0827;
(c) Is registered or certified in another state and is located in this
State for not more than 15 days;
(d) Is used solely for husbandry on private land or on public
land that is leased to or used under a permit issued to the owner or
operator of the off-highway vehicle;
(e) Is used for work conducted by or at the direction of a public
or private utility;
(f) Was manufactured before January 1, 1976;
(g) Is operated solely in an organized race, festival or other
event that is conducted:
(1) Under the auspices of a sanctioning body; or
(2) By permit issued by a governmental entity having
jurisdiction;
(h) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), is operated or
stored on private land or on public land that is leased to the owner or
operator of the off-highway vehicle, including when operated in an
organized race, festival or other event;
(i) Is used in a search and rescue operation conducted by a
governmental entity having jurisdiction; or
(j) Has a displacement of not more than 70 cubic centimeters.
 As used in this subsection, “sanctioning body” means an
organization that establishes a schedule of racing events, grants
rights to conduct those events and establishes and administers rules
and regulations governing the persons who conduct or participate in
those events.
-
*SB243*

– 58 –
4. The registration of an off-highway vehicle pursuant to this
section or NRS 490.0825 expires 1 year after its issuance. If an
owner of an off-highway vehicle fails to renew the registration of
the off-highway vehicle before it expires, the registration may be
reinstated upon the payment to the Department or a Class I
authorized third party of the annual renewal fee, a late fee of $10
and, if applicable, proof of insurance required pursuant to NRS
490.0825. Any late fee collected by the Department or a Class I
authorized third party must be deposited with the State Treasurer
for credit to the Revolving Account for the Administration of Off-
Highway Vehicle Titling and Registration created by NRS 490.085.
5. If a certificate of title or registration for an off-highway
vehicle is lost or destroyed, the owner of the off-highway vehicle
may apply to the Department by mail, or to an authorized dealer [,]
or a Class I authorized third party, for a duplicate certificate of title
or registration. The Department or a Class I authorized third party
may collect a fee to replace a certificate of title or registration
certificate, sticker or decal that is lost, damaged or destroyed. Any
such fee collected by the Department or a Class I authorized third
party must be:
(a) Set forth by the Department by regulation; and
(b) Deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the
Revolving Account for the Administration of Off-Highway Vehicle
Titling and Registration created by NRS 490.085.
6. The provisions of subsections 1 to 5, inclusive, do not apply
to an owner of an off-highway vehicle who is not a resident of this
State.
Sec. 59. NRS 490.0825 is hereby amended to read as follows:
490.0825 1. Upon the request of an owner of a large all-
terrain vehicle, the Department or a Class I authorized third party
shall register the large all-terrain vehicle to operate on the roads
specified in NRS 490.105.
2. The owner of a large all-terrain vehicle wishing to apply for
registration or renewal of registration pursuant to this section must
obtain and maintain insurance on the vehicle that meets the
requirements of NRS 485.185.
3. If an owner of a large all-terrain vehicle applies to the
Department or a Class I authorized third party for the registration
of the vehicle pursuant to this section, the owner shall submit to the
Department [:] or Class I authorized third party:
(a) The information required for registration pursuant to
NRS 490.082;
(b) The fee for registration required pursuant to NRS 490.084;
(c) Proof satisfactory to the Department or the Class I
authorized third party that the applicant carries insurance on the
-
*SB243*

– 59 –
vehicle provided by an insurance company licensed by the Division
of Insurance of the Department of Business and Industry and
approved to do business in this State which meets the requirements
of NRS 485.185; and
(d) A declaration signed by the applicant that he or she will
maintain the insurance required by this section during the period of
registration.
Sec. 60. NRS 108.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
108.365 Any person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who
knowingly:
1. Makes or causes to be made a false entry on any affidavit of
lien sale or on any lien sale registration certificate for a motor
vehicle;
2. Makes or causes to be made a false entry on a certificate of
title as to ownership or any security interest that may exist in a
motor vehicle;
3. Fails to disclose any information which would indicate that a
vehicle sold or offered for sale is or should be considered a salvage
or nonrepairable vehicle; or
4. Falsifies or causes to be falsified an application or other
document submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles or a
Class I authorized third party, as defined in section 6 of this act, to
obtain:
(a) A certificate of title or ownership; or
(b) A salvage title or a certificate which indicates that the
vehicle is nonrepairable as defined in chapter 487 of NRS.
Sec. 61. NRS 281.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.050 1. The residence of a person with reference to his or
her eligibility to any office is the person’s actual residence within
the State, county, district, ward, subdistrict or any other unit
prescribed by law, as the case may be, during all the period for
which residence is claimed by the person.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, if any
person absents himself or herself from the jurisdiction of that
person’s actual residence with the intention in good faith to return
without delay and continue such actual residence, the period of
absence must not be considered in determining the question of
residence.
3. If a person who has filed a declaration of candidacy for any
elective office moves the person’s actual residence out of the State,
county, district, ward, subdistrict or any other unit prescribed by
law, as the case may be, in which the person is required actually, as
opposed to constructively, to reside in order for the person to be
eligible to the office, a vacancy is created thereby and the
appropriate action for filling the vacancy must be taken.
-
*SB243*

– 60 –
4. Once a person’s actual residence is fixed, the person shall be
deemed to have moved the person’s actual residence for the
purposes of this section if:
(a) The person has acted affirmatively and has actually removed
himself or herself from the place of permanent habitation where the
person actually resided and was legally domiciled;
(b) The person has an intention to abandon the place of
permanent habitation where the person actually resided and was
legally domiciled; and
(c) The person has an intention to remain in another place of
permanent habitation where the person actually resides and is
legally domiciled.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
293.1265, the district court has jurisdiction to determine the
question of residence in any preelection action for declaratory
judgment brought against a person who has filed a declaration of
candidacy for any elective office. If the question of residence relates
to whether an incumbent meets any qualification concerning
residence required for the term of office in which the incumbent is
presently serving, the district court does not have jurisdiction to
determine the question of residence in an action for declaratory
judgment brought by a person pursuant to this section but has
jurisdiction to determine the question of residence only in an action
to declare the office vacant that is authorized by NRS 283.040 and
brought by the Attorney General or the appropriate district attorney
pursuant to that section.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.1265, if in any
preelection action for declaratory judgment, the district court finds
that a person who has filed a declaration of candidacy for any
elective office fails to meet any qualification concerning residence
required for the office pursuant to the Constitution or laws of this
State, the person is subject to the provisions of NRS 293.2045.
7. For the purposes of this section, in determining whether a
place of permanent habitation is the place where a person actually
resides and is legally domiciled:
(a) It is the public policy of this State to avoid sham residences
and to ensure that the person actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in the area prescribed by law for the office so the person has
an actual connection with the constituents who reside in the area and
has particular knowledge of their concerns.
(b) The person may have more than one residence but only one
legal domicile, and the person’s legal domicile requires both the fact
of actual living in the place and the intention to remain there as a
permanent residence. If the person temporarily leaves the person’s
legal domicile, or leaves for a particular purpose, and does not take
-
*SB243*

– 61 –
up a permanent residence in another place, then the person’s legal
domicile has not changed. Once the person’s legal domicile is fixed,
the fact of actual living in another place, the intention to remain in
the other place and the intention to abandon the former legal
domicile must all exist before the person’s legal domicile can
change.
(c) Evidence of the person’s legal domicile includes, without
limitation:
(1) The place where the person lives the majority of the time
and the length of time the person has lived in that place.
(2) The place where the person lives with the person’s
spouse or domestic partner, if any.
(3) The place where the person lives with the person’s
children, dependents or relatives, if any.
(4) The place where the person lives with any other
individual whose relationship with the person is substantially similar
to a relationship with a spouse, domestic partner, child, dependent or
relative.
(5) The place where the person’s dogs, cats or other pets, if
any, live.
(6) The place listed as the person’s residential address on the
voter registration card, as defined in NRS 293.1205, issued to the
person.
(7) The place listed as the person’s residential address on any
driver’s license or identification card issued to the person by the
Department of Motor Vehicles, any passport or military
identification card issued to the person by the United States or any
other form of identification issued to the person by a governmental
agency.
(8) The place listed as the person’s residential address on any
registration for a motor vehicle issued to the person by the
Department of Motor Vehicles or a Class I authorized third party
or any registration for another type of vehicle or mode of
transportation, including, without limitation, any aircraft, vessels or
watercraft, issued to the person by a governmental agency.
(9) The place listed as the person’s residential address on any
applications for issuance or renewal of any license, certificate,
registration, permit or similar type of authorization issued to the
person by a governmental agency which has the authority to
regulate an occupation or profession.
(10) The place listed as the person’s residential address on
any document which the person is authorized or required by law to
file or record with a governmental agency, including, without
limitation, any deed, declaration of homestead or other record of
real or personal property, any applications for services, privileges or
-
*SB243*

– 62 –
benefits or any tax documents, forms or returns, but excluding the
person’s declaration of candidacy.
(11) The place listed as the person’s residential address on
any type of check, payment, benefit or reimbursement issued to the
person by a governmental agency or by any type of company that
provides insurance, workers’ compensation, health care or medical
benefits or any self-insured employer or third-party administrator.
(12) The place listed as the person’s residential address on
the person’s paycheck, paystub or employment records.
(13) The place listed as the person’s residential address on
the person’s bank statements, insurance statements, mortgage
statements, loan statements, financial accounts, credit card accounts,
utility accounts or other billing statements or accounts.
(14) The place where the person receives mail or deliveries
from the United States Postal Service or commercial carriers.
(d) The evidence listed in paragraph (c) is intended to be
illustrative and is not intended to be exhaustive or exclusive. The
presence or absence of any particular type of evidence listed in
paragraph (c) is not, by itself, determinative of the person’s legal
domicile, but such a determination must be based upon all the facts
and circumstances of the person’s particular case.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Actual residence” means the place of permanent habitation
where a person actually resides and is legally domiciled. If the
person maintains more than one place of permanent habitation, the
place the person declares to be the person’s principal permanent
habitation when filing a declaration of candidacy for any elective
office must be the place where the person actually resides and is
legally domiciled in order for the person to be eligible to the office.
(b) “Class I authorized third party” has the meaning ascribed
to it in section 6 of this act.
(c) “Declaration of candidacy” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.0455.
Sec. 62. NRS 371.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Class I authorized third party” has the meaning ascribed
to it in section 6 of this act.
2. “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.
[2.] 3. “Vehicle” means any vehicle required to be registered
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 482 or 706 of NRS, except
mobile homes as defined in NRS 482.067.
Sec. 63. NRS 371.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, the annual amount of the basic governmental services tax
-
*SB243*

– 63 –
throughout the State is 4 cents on each $1 of valuation of the vehicle
as determined by the Department [.] or a Class I authorized third
party.
2. A full trailer or semitrailer registered pursuant to subsection
3 of NRS 482.483 is subject to the basic governmental services tax
in the nonrefundable amount of $86 each time such a full trailer or
semitrailer is registered pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.483.
3. The amount of the basic governmental services tax imposed
on a moped registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155 is 4 cents on each
$1 of valuation of the moped as determined by the Department or a
Class I authorized third party at the time of registration.
Sec. 64. NRS 371.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and
4, valuation of vehicles must be determined by the Department or a
Class I authorized third party upon the basis of 35 percent of the
manufacturer’s suggested retail price in Nevada excluding options
and extras, as of the time the particular make and model for that
year is first offered for sale in Nevada.
2. If the Department or Class I authorized third party is unable
to determine the manufacturer’s suggested retail price in Nevada
with respect to any vehicle because the vehicle is specially
constructed, or for any other reason, the Department or Class I
authorized third party shall determine the valuation upon the basis
of 35 percent of the original retail price to the original purchaser of
the vehicle as evidenced by such document or documents as the
Department may require.
3. For each:
(a) Bus, truck, truck-tractor or combination of vehicles having a
declared gross weight of 10,000 pounds or more; and
(b) Trailer or semitrailer having an unladen weight of 4,000
pounds or more,
 the Department or Class I authorized third party may use 85
percent of the original purchaser’s cost price in lieu of the
manufacturer’s suggested retail price.
4. If the Department or Class I authorized third party is unable
to determine the original manufacturer’s suggested retail price in
Nevada, or the original retail price to the purchaser, the Department
or Class I authorized third party may determine the original value
of the vehicle on the basis of 50 cents per pound.
5. For motor carriers which register pursuant to the provisions
of the Interstate Highway User Fee Apportionment Act, the
Department may determine the original purchaser’s cost price of the
vehicle on the basis of its declared gross weight in a manner which
the Department finds appropriate and equitable.
-
*SB243*

– 64 –
Sec. 65. NRS 371.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.060 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
subsection 2 of NRS 371.040 and NRS 482.2155, each vehicle must
be depreciated by the Department or a Class I authorized third
party for the purposes of the annual governmental services tax
according to the following schedule:
Percentage of
Age Initial Value

New ........................................................................ 100 percent
1 year ........................................................................ 95 percent
2 years....................................................................... 85 percent
3 years....................................................................... 75 percent
4 years....................................................................... 65 percent
5 years....................................................................... 55 percent
6 years....................................................................... 45 percent
7 years....................................................................... 35 percent
8 years....................................................................... 25 percent
9 years or more ......................................................... 15 percent

2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3 of NRS
371.040, each bus, truck or truck-tractor having a declared gross
weight of 10,000 pounds or more and each trailer or semitrailer
having an unladen weight of 4,000 pounds or more must be
depreciated by the Department or a Class I authorized third party
for the purposes of the annual governmental services tax according
to the following schedule:
Percentage of
Age Initial Value

New ........................................................................ 100 percent
1 year ........................................................................ 85 percent
2 years....................................................................... 69 percent
3 years....................................................................... 57 percent
4 years....................................................................... 47 percent
5 years....................................................................... 38 percent
6 years....................................................................... 33 percent
7 years....................................................................... 30 percent
8 years....................................................................... 27 percent
9 years....................................................................... 25 percent
10 years or more ....................................................... 23 percent

3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
minimum amount of the governmental services tax:
-
*SB243*

– 65 –
(a) On any trailer having an unladen weight of 1,000 pounds or
less is $3; and
(b) On any other vehicle is $16.
4. For the purposes of this section, a vehicle shall be deemed a
“new” vehicle if the vehicle has never been registered with the
Department and has never been registered with the appropriate
agency of any other state, the District of Columbia, any territory or
possession of the United States or any foreign state, province or
country.
Sec. 66. NRS 371.101 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.101 1. Vehicles registered by surviving spouses, not to
exceed the amount of $1,000 determined valuation, are exempt from
taxation, but the exemption must not be allowed to anyone but
actual bona fide residents of this State, and must be filed in but one
county in this State to the same family.
2. For the purpose of this section, vehicles in which the
surviving spouse has any interest shall be deemed to belong entirely
to that surviving spouse.
3. The person claiming the exemption shall file with the
Department or a Class I authorized third party in the county where
the exemption is claimed an affidavit declaring his or her residency
and that the exemption has been claimed in no other county in this
State for that year. The affidavit must be made before the county
assessor or a notary public. After the filing of the original affidavit,
the county assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, mail a form for renewal of the exemption to the person
each year following a year in which the exemption was allowed for
that person. The form must be designed to facilitate its return by
mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so requested by the
person claiming the exemption, the county assessor may provide the
form to the person by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
4. A surviving spouse is not entitled to the exemption provided
by this section in any fiscal year beginning after any remarriage,
even if the remarriage is later annulled.
5. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amount in subsection 1 must be adjusted for each fiscal year by
adding to each amount the product of the amount multiplied by the
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index (All Items) from
December 2003 to the December preceding the fiscal year for which
the adjustment is calculated.
Sec. 67. NRS 371.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.103 1. Vehicles, to the extent of $2,000 determined
valuation, registered by any actual bona fide resident of the State of
Nevada who:
-
*SB243*

– 66 –
(a) Has served a minimum of 90 days on active duty, who was
assigned to active duty at some time between April 21, 1898, and
June 15, 1903, or between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918,
or between December 7, 1941, and December 31, 1946, or between
June 25, 1950, and May 7, 1975, or between September 26, 1982,
and December 1, 1987, or between October 23, 1983, and
November 21, 1983, or between December 20, 1989, and
January 31, 1990, or between August 2, 1990, and April 11, 1991,
or between December 5, 1992, and March 31, 1994, or between
November 20, 1995, and December 20, 1996;
(b) Has served a minimum of 90 continuous days on active duty
none of which was for training purposes, who was assigned to active
duty at some time between January 1, 1961, and May 7, 1975;
(c) Has served on active duty in connection with carrying out
the authorization granted to the President of the United States in
Public Law 102-1; or
(d) Has served on active duty in connection with a campaign or
expedition for service in which a medal has been authorized by the
Government of the United States, regardless of the number of days
served on active duty,
 and who received, upon severance from service, an honorable
discharge or certificate of satisfactory service from the Armed
Forces of the United States, or who, having so served, is still serving
in the Armed Forces of the United States, is exempt from taxation.
2. In lieu of claiming the exemption from taxation set forth in
subsection 1 in his or her name, a veteran may transfer the
exemption to his or her current spouse. To transfer the exemption,
the veteran must file an affidavit of transfer with the Department or
a Class I authorized third party in the county where the exemption
would otherwise have been claimed. The affidavit of transfer must
be made before an authorized employee of the Department or a
notary public. If a veteran makes such a transfer:
(a) The spouse of the veteran is entitled to the exemption in the
same manner as if the spouse were the veteran;
(b) The veteran is not entitled to the exemption for the duration
of the transfer;
(c) The transfer expires upon the earlier of:
(1) The termination of the marriage;
(2) The death of the veteran; or
(3) The revocation of the transfer by the veteran as described
in paragraph (d); and
(d) The veteran may, at any time, revoke the transfer of the
exemption by filing with the Department or a Class I authorized
third party in the county where the exemption is claimed an
-
*SB243*

– 67 –
affidavit made before an authorized employee of the Department or
a notary public.
3. For the purpose of this section, the first $2,000 determined
valuation of vehicles in which a person described in subsection 1 or
2 has any interest shall be deemed to belong to that person.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a person
claiming the exemption shall file annually with the Department or a
Class I authorized third party in the county where the exemption is
claimed an affidavit declaring that he or she is an actual bona fide
resident of the State of Nevada who meets all the other requirements
of subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, and that the exemption is
claimed in no other county in this State. The affidavit must be made
before the county assessor or a notary public. After the filing of the
original affidavit of exemption and after the transfer of the
exemption, if any, pursuant to subsection 2, the county assessor
shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail a form
for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person who claimed the exemption each year following a
year in which the exemption was allowed for that person. The form
must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by the person
claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person claiming the
exemption, the county assessor may provide the form to the person
by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
5. Persons in actual military service are exempt during the
period of such service from filing annual affidavits of exemption
and the Department shall grant exemptions to those persons on the
basis of the original affidavits filed. In the case of any person who
has entered the military service without having previously made and
filed an affidavit of exemption, the affidavit may be filed in his or
her behalf during the period of such service by any person having
knowledge of the facts.
6. Before allowing any veteran’s exemption pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, the Department or Class I authorized
third party shall require proof of status of the veteran or, if a
transfer has been made pursuant to subsection 2, proof of status of
the veteran to whom the person claiming the exemption is married,
and for that purpose shall require production of an honorable
discharge or certificate of satisfactory service or a certified copy
thereof, or such other proof of status as may be necessary.
-
*SB243*

– 68 –
7. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof to
the Department [,] or a Class I authorized third party, and as a
result of the false affidavit or false proof a tax exemption is allowed
to a person not entitled to the exemption, the person is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
8. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amounts in subsections 1 and 3 must be adjusted for each fiscal year
by adding to each amount the product of the amount multiplied by
the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index (All Items)
from December 2003 to the December preceding the fiscal year for
which the adjustment is calculated.
Sec. 68. NRS 371.1035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.1035 1. Any person who qualifies for an exemption
pursuant to NRS 371.103 or 371.104 may, in lieu of claiming the
exemption:
(a) Pay to the Department or a Class I authorized third party all
or any portion of the amount by which the tax would be reduced if
the person claimed the exemption; and
(b) Direct the Department to deposit that amount for credit to
the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the
Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145.
2. Any person who wishes to waive his or her exemption
pursuant to this section shall designate the amount to be credited to
a Gift Account on a form provided by the Department [.] or a Class
I authorized third party.
3. The Department shall deposit any money received pursuant
to this section with the State Treasurer for credit to the Gift Account
for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift Account for
the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established pursuant to NRS
417.145. The State Treasurer shall not accept more than a total of
$2,000,000 for credit to a Gift Account pursuant to this section and
NRS 361.0905 during any fiscal year.
Sec. 69. NRS 371.104 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.104 1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who
has incurred a permanent service-connected disability and has been
honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States,
or his or her surviving spouse, is entitled to a veteran’s exemption
from the payment of governmental services taxes on vehicles of the
following determined valuations:
(a) If he or she has a disability of 100 percent, the first $20,000
of determined valuation.
(b) If he or she has a disability of 80 to 99 percent, inclusive, the
first $15,000 of determined valuation.
-
*SB243*

– 69 –
(c) If he or she has a disability of 60 to 79 percent, inclusive, the
first $10,000 of determined valuation.
2. In lieu of claiming the exemption from taxation set forth in
subsection 1 in his or her name, a veteran may transfer the
exemption to his or her current spouse. To transfer the exemption,
the veteran must file an affidavit of transfer with the Department or
a Class I authorized third party in the county where the exemption
would otherwise have been claimed. The affidavit of transfer must
be made before an authorized employee of the Department or a
notary public. If a veteran makes such a transfer:
(a) The spouse of the veteran is entitled to the exemption in the
same manner as if the spouse were the veteran;
(b) The veteran is not entitled to the exemption for the duration
of the transfer;
(c) The transfer expires upon the earlier of:
(1) The termination of the marriage;
(2) The death of the veteran; or
(3) The revocation of the transfer by the veteran as described
in paragraph (d); and
(d) The veteran may, at any time, revoke the transfer of the
exemption by filing with the Department or a Class I authorized
third party in the county where the exemption is claimed an
affidavit made before an authorized employee of the Department or
a notary public.
3. For the purpose of this section, the first $20,000 of
determined valuation of vehicles in which a person described in
subsection 1 or 2 has any interest shall be deemed to belong entirely
to that person.
4. A person claiming the exemption shall file annually with the
Department or a Class I authorized third party in the county where
the exemption is claimed an affidavit declaring that he or she is a
bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who meets all the other
requirements of subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, and that the
exemption is claimed in no other county within this State. After the
filing of the original affidavit of exemption and after the transfer of
the exemption, if any, pursuant to subsection 2, the county assessor
shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail a form
for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person who claimed the exemption each year following a
year in which the exemption was allowed for that person. The form
-
*SB243*

– 70 –
must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by the person
claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person claiming the
exemption, the county assessor may provide the form to the person
by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
5. Before allowing any exemption pursuant to the provisions of
this section, the Department or a Class I authorized third party
shall require proof of the veteran’s status, and for that purpose shall
require production of:
(a) A certificate from the Department of Veterans Affairs that
the veteran has incurred a permanent service-connected disability,
which shows the percentage of that disability; and
(b) Any one of the following:
(1) An honorable discharge;
(2) A certificate of satisfactory service; or
(3) A certified copy of either of these documents.
6. A surviving spouse claiming an exemption pursuant to this
section must file with the Department or a Class I authorized third
party in the county where the exemption is claimed an affidavit
declaring that:
(a) The surviving spouse was married to and living with the
veteran with a disability for the 5 years preceding his or her death;
(b) The veteran with a disability was eligible for the exemption
at the time of his or her death or, if not for a transfer of the
exemption pursuant to subsection 2, would have been eligible for
the exemption at the time of his or her death; and
(c) The surviving spouse has not remarried.
 The affidavit required by this subsection is in addition to the
certification required pursuant to subsections 4 and 5. After the
filing of the original affidavit required by this subsection, the county
assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail
a form for renewal of the exemption to the person each year
following a year in which the exemption was allowed for that
person. The form must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by
the person claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person
claiming the exemption, the county assessor may provide the form
to the person by electronic means in lieu of by mail.
7. If a tax exemption is allowed under this section to a person
who qualifies for the tax exemption:
(a) As a veteran or as the current spouse of a veteran who
receives a transfer of an exemption pursuant to subsection 2, that
person is not entitled to an exemption under NRS 371.103.
(b) Solely as the surviving spouse of a veteran with a permanent
service-connected disability, the allowance of a tax exemption under
this section does not affect the eligibility of that person for an
exemption under NRS 371.103.
-
*SB243*

– 71 –
8. If any person makes a false affidavit or produces false proof
to the Department [,] or a Class I authorized third party, and as a
result of the false affidavit or false proof the person is allowed a tax
exemption to which he or she is not entitled, the person is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
9. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amounts in subsections 1 and 3 must be adjusted for each fiscal year
by adding to each amount the product of the amount multiplied by
the percentage increase in the consumer price inflation index from
July 2003 to the July preceding the fiscal year for which the
adjustment is calculated.
10. For the purposes of this section, “consumer price inflation
index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as published by the United States
Department of Labor or, if that index ceases to be published by the
United States Department of Labor, the published index selected by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 11 of
NRS 361.091.
Sec. 70. NRS 371.106 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.106 1. Whenever any vehicle ceases to be exempt from
taxation under NRS 371.101, 371.102, 371.103 or 371.104 because
the owner no longer meets the requirements for the exemption
provided in those sections, its owner shall immediately notify the
Department or a Class I authorized third party of the fact.
2. If a person fails to notify the Department or a Class I
authorized third party as required by subsection 1 and as a result of
such failure is allowed a tax exemption to which he or she is not
entitled, there shall be added to and collected with the tax otherwise
due a penalty equal to double the amount of the tax. If the person’s
failure is fraudulent and results in his or her receiving a tax
exemption to which he or she is not entitled, the person is also guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 71. NRS 371.107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.107 The county assessor of each county whose population
is 55,000 or more is designated as an agent to assist the Department
in administering the exemptions provided in this chapter, and shall,
after establishing the validity of an application for an exemption,
issue a certificate for use by the Department or a Class I authorized
third party to allow a claimant the appropriate exemption on his or
her vehicle.
Sec. 72. NRS 371.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.120 The Department or a Class I authorized third party
shall collect the governmental services tax and issue to each person
who pays the tax a receipt that sufficiently identifies the vehicle
upon which the tax is paid.
-
*SB243*

– 72 –
Sec. 73. NRS 371.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.140 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and
NRS 482.209 and 482.482, if the governmental services tax for a
vehicle for the next period of registration is not paid before the
expiration of the current period of registration for that vehicle, a
penalty equal to 10 percent of the tax due, but not less than $6, plus
the amount of the delinquent tax, must be added to the governmental
services tax due for the next period of registration, unless the
vehicle has not been operated on the highways since the expiration
of the prior registration. The Department may retain any penalty so
collected. If the payment is made to a Class I authorized third
party, the Class I authorized third party must remit the penalty to
the Department, and the Department may retain the penalty.
2. Evidence of the nonoperation of a vehicle must be made by
an affidavit executed by a person having knowledge of the fact. The
affidavit must accompany the application for renewal of registration.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to vehicles
registered pursuant to NRS 706.841.
Sec. 74. NRS 371.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.150 Upon receipt of an application for renewal of
registration and an affidavit of nonoperation, the Department or a
Class I authorized third party shall collect the tax for the current
registration year. No penalty shall be imposed if the Department or
the Class I authorized third party receives the application and
affidavit within 30 days after the date of the first operation of the
vehicle during the current registration year.
Sec. 75. NRS 371.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.180 If a transferee applies for a transfer of registration and
it is determined by the Department or a Class I authorized third
party that penalties for the nonpayment of the governmental services
tax accrued before the transfer of the vehicle, and that the transferee
was not cognizant of the nonpayment of the governmental services
tax for the current or prior years, and the whereabouts of the
transferor or record owner are unknown, the Department or Class I
authorized third party may waive payment of the penalties upon
payment of the governmental services taxes due.
Sec. 76. NRS 371.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.220 If the Department or a Class I authorized third party
erroneously collects any governmental services tax or penalty not
required to be paid under the provisions of this chapter, the amount
must be refunded to the person who paid it upon application therefor
within 3 years after the date of the payment.
Sec. 77. NRS 371.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.230 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 371.1035,
482.180, 482.181 and 482.182, money collected by the Department
-
*SB243*

– 73 –
or a Class I authorized third party for governmental services taxes
and penalties pursuant to the provisions of this chapter must be
deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Motor Vehicle
Fund.
Sec. 78. NRS 445B.815 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.815 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
persons employed at branch offices of the Department of Motor
Vehicles , [and] the offices of county assessors who are acting as
agents of the Department in the collection of fees for registration
and Class I authorized third parties shall not register:
(a) A passenger car or light-duty motor vehicle which:
(1) Uses motor vehicle fuel or special fuel;
(2) Is based in a county whose population is 100,000 or
more; and
(3) Requires inspection pursuant to the regulations adopted
by the Commission under NRS 445B.770;
(b) A heavy-duty motor vehicle having a manufacturer’s gross
vehicle weight rating which does not exceed 14,000 pounds, that:
(1) Uses diesel fuel;
(2) Is based in a county whose population is 100,000 or
more; and
(3) Requires inspection pursuant to the regulations adopted
by the Commission under NRS 445B.770;
(c) A heavy-duty motor vehicle that:
(1) Uses motor vehicle fuel or special fuel, excluding diesel
fuel;
(2) Is based in a county whose population is 100,000 or
more; and
(3) Requires inspection pursuant to the regulations adopted
by the Commission under NRS 445B.770; or
(d) A vehicle which:
(1) Is based in an area of this State designated by the
Commission; and
(2) Requires inspection pursuant to the regulations adopted
by the Commission under NRS 445B.770,
 until evidence of compliance with NRS 445B.700 to 445B.845,
inclusive, has been provided.
2. An owner or lessee of a fleet of three or more vehicles may,
upon application to the Department of Motor Vehicles, submit
evidence of compliance for those motor vehicles in a manner
determined by that Department.
3. As used in this section, “Class I authorized third party”
has the meaning ascribed to it in section 6 of this act.
-
*SB243*

– 74 –
Sec. 79. NRS 445B.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.830 1. In areas of the State where and when a program
is commenced pursuant to NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815, inclusive,
the following fees must be paid to the Department of Motor
Vehicles and accounted for in the Pollution Control Account, which
is hereby created in the State General Fund:
(a) For the issuance and annual renewal of a license
for an authorized inspection station, authorized station
or fleet station ............................................................................... $25
(b) For each set of 25 forms certifying emission
control compliance ........................................................................ 150
(c) For each form issued to a fleet station ................................... 6
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, and after
deduction of the amounts distributed pursuant to subsections 4 and
7, money in the Pollution Control Account may, pursuant to
legislative appropriation or with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee, be expended by the following agencies in the following
order of priority:
(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles to carry out the
provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.845, inclusive.
(b) The State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The State Department of Agriculture to carry out the
provisions of NRS 590.010 to 590.150, inclusive.
(d) Local air pollution control agencies in nonattainment or
maintenance areas for an air pollutant for which air quality criteria
have been issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408, for programs related
to the improvement of the quality of the air.
(e) The Tahoe Regional Planning Agency to carry out the
provisions of NRS 277.200 with respect to the preservation and
improvement of air quality in the Lake Tahoe Basin.
3. The Department of Motor Vehicles may prescribe by
regulation routine fees for inspection at the prevailing shop labor
rate, including, without limitation, maximum charges for those fees,
and for the posting of those fees in a conspicuous place at an
authorized inspection station or authorized station.
4. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make quarterly
distributions of money in the Pollution Control Account to local air
pollution control agencies in nonattainment or maintenance areas for
an air pollutant for which air quality criteria have been issued
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408. The distributions of money made to
agencies in a county pursuant to this subsection must be made from
an amount of money in the Pollution Control Account that is equal
to one-sixth of the amount received for each form issued in the
county pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*SB243*

– 75 –
5. Each local air pollution control agency that receives money
pursuant to subsections 4, 6 and 7 shall, not later than 45 days after
the end of the fiscal year in which the money is received, submit to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Interim Finance Committee a report on the use of the money
received.
6. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make annual
distributions of excess money in the Pollution Control Account to
local air pollution control agencies in nonattainment or maintenance
areas for an air pollutant for which air quality criteria have been
issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408, for programs related to the
improvement of the quality of the air. The distributions of excess
money made to local air pollution control agencies in a county
pursuant to this subsection must be made in an amount
proportionate to the number of forms issued in the county pursuant
to subsection 1. As used in this subsection, “excess money” means
the money in excess of $1,000,000 remaining in the Pollution
Control Account at the end of the fiscal year, after deduction of the
amounts distributed pursuant to subsections 4 and 7 and any
disbursements made from the Account pursuant to subsection 2.
7. If a board of county commissioners imposes an additional
fee pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 445B.834, the Department of
Motor Vehicles shall:
(a) Upon receiving the notification pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 445B.834, collect the additional fee on behalf of the county
and account separately for money from the additional fee in the
Pollution Control Account; and
(b) Make quarterly distributions of the money in the Pollution
Control Account attributable to each county whose board of county
commissioners imposed the additional fee. The distributions made
pursuant to this paragraph must be equal to the amount of money
collected on behalf of the county pursuant to the additional fee
imposed by the board of county commissioners of the county.
8. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide for the
creation of an advisory committee consisting of representatives of
state and local agencies involved in the control of emissions from
motor vehicles. The committee shall:
(a) Establish goals and objectives for the program for control of
emissions from motor vehicles;
(b) Identify areas where funding should be made available; and
(c) Review and make recommendations concerning regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 445B.770.
9. The State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources shall ensure that the forms available from the
Department pursuant to subsection 1, including, without
-
*SB243*

– 76 –
limitation, any digital or electronic versions of those forms, use the
same terms regarding the make, model and features of a vehicle as
any other forms of the Department used for the inspection of
vehicles required by this chapter or required or authorized by title
43 of NRS.
Sec. 80. NRS 706.4477 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.4477 1. If towing is requested by a person other than the
owner, or an agent of the owner, of the motor vehicle or a law
enforcement officer or other person who is employed to enforce the
laws, ordinances and codes of a local government:
(a) The person requesting the towing must be the owner of the
real property from which the vehicle is towed or an authorized agent
of the owner of the real property and must sign a specific request for
the towing. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, for the
purposes of this section, the operator is not an authorized agent of
the owner of the real property.
(b) The area from which the vehicle is to be towed must be
appropriately posted in accordance with state or local requirements.
(c) Notice must be given to the appropriate law enforcement
agency pursuant to state and local requirements.
(d) The operator may be directed to terminate the towing by a
law enforcement officer.
2. If, pursuant to subsection 1, the owner of the real property or
authorized agent of the owner of the real property requests that a
vehicle be towed from a residential complex at which the vehicle is
located, the owner of the real property or authorized agent of the
owner, which may be the tow operator if the tow operator has
entered into a contract for that purpose with the owner of the real
property:
(a) Must:
(1) Meet the requirements of subsection 1.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, if the
vehicle is being towed pursuant to subparagraph (1) or (2) of
paragraph (b), notify the owner or operator of the vehicle of the tow
not less than 48 hours before the tow by affixing to the vehicle a
sticker which provides the date and time after which the vehicle will
be towed. The provisions of this subparagraph do not apply and the
vehicle may be immediately towed if it is a vehicle for which a
notice was previously affixed:
(I) For the same or a similar reason within the same
residential complex.
(II) Three or more times during the immediately
preceding 6 months within the same residential complex for any
reason, regardless of whether the vehicle was subsequently towed.
(b) May only have a vehicle towed:
-
*SB243*

– 77 –
(1) Because of a parking violation;
(2) If the vehicle is not registered pursuant to this chapter or
chapter 482 of NRS or in any other state; or
(3) If the vehicle is:
(I) Blocking a fire hydrant, fire lane or parking space
designated for the handicapped; or
(II) Posing an imminent threat of causing a substantial
adverse effect on the health, safety or welfare of the residents of the
residential complex, which may include, without limitation, if the
vehicle is parked in a space that is clearly marked for a specific
resident or the use of a specific unit in the residential complex.
(c) May not have a vehicle towed solely because the registration
of the vehicle is expired. An operator may not charge any fee or
cost for towing a vehicle in violation of this paragraph. The towing
of a vehicle solely because the registration of the vehicle is
expired is a violation of this section, subject to the provisions of
subsection [9.] 10.
3. If towing is requested by a county or city pursuant to NRS
244.3605 or 268.4122, as applicable:
(a) Notice must be given to the appropriate law enforcement
agency pursuant to state and local requirements.
(b) The operator may be directed to terminate the towing by a
law enforcement officer.
4. If towing is requested based on subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (b) of subsection 2, the operator shall independently
verify the registration status of the vehicle before towing the
vehicle. The operator shall retain evidence of such verification for
not less than 1 year. An operator who fails to comply with this
subsection is responsible for the cost of removal and storage of the
vehicle.
5. The owner of a motor vehicle towed pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 1, 2 or 3:
(a) Is presumed to have left the motor vehicle on the real
property from which the vehicle is towed; and
(b) [Subject] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 and
subject to the provisions of subsection [7,] 8, is responsible for the
cost of removal and storage of the motor vehicle.
[5.] 6. The owner may rebut the presumption in subsection [4]
5 by showing that:
(a) The owner transferred the owner’s interest in the motor
vehicle:
(1) Pursuant to the provisions set forth in NRS 482.399 to
482.420, inclusive; or
(2) As indicated by a bill of sale for the vehicle that is signed
by the owner; or
-
*SB243*

– 78 –
(b) The vehicle is stolen, if the owner submits evidence that,
before the discovery of the vehicle, the owner filed an affidavit with
the Department or a written report with an appropriate law
enforcement agency alleging the theft of the vehicle.
[6.] 7. An operator shall not charge any fee or cost for the
storage of the motor vehicle until at least 48 hours after the motor
vehicle arrives and is registered at the place of storage. If the motor
vehicle arrives at the place of storage after the regular business
hours of the place of storage, the 48-hour period begins when the
regular business hours of the place of storage next begin.
[7.] 8. An operator shall consider charging a rate which is
lower than the rate set forth in the otherwise applicable schedule or
tariff for the cost of removal and storage of the motor vehicle if the
owner of the vehicle, for reasons outside of his or her control as
determined by the regulations adopted pursuant to this section, is
incapable of paying the normal rate charged for the removal and
storage of the motor vehicle. An operator may deviate from the
otherwise applicable schedule or tariff without the approval of the
Authority to charge a lower rate pursuant to this subsection.
[8.] 9. The Authority shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation, setting forth
what qualifies as a reason that is outside of the control of the owner.
[9.] 10. If a motor vehicle is towed in violation of the
provisions of this section or an operator charges any fee or cost for
the towing of a motor vehicle in violation of this section:
(a) The operator may be subject to a penalty in accordance with
the provisions of NRS 706.756 to 706.781, inclusive; and
(b) The owner of the vehicle may bring an action against the
operator to recover any costs incurred by the person as a result of
the violation, including, without limitation, any loss of income.
[10.] 11. An operator shall display conspicuously in his or her
place of business a written notice which must contain, in boldface
type letters not less than 1 inch in height and 1 inch in width:
(a) A statement that the operator must consider charging a lower
rate under certain circumstances; and
(b) A telephone number for the Authority where a person may
report a violation of the provisions of this chapter.
[11.] 12. As used in this section:
(a) “Parking violation” means a violation of any:
(1) State or local law or ordinance governing parking; or
(2) Parking rule promulgated by the owner or manager of the
residential complex that applies to vehicles on the property of the
residential complex.
(b) “Residential complex” means a group of apartments,
condominiums or townhomes intended for use as residential units
-
*SB243*

– 79 –
and for which a common parking area is provided, regardless of
whether each resident or unit has been assigned a specific parking
space in the common parking area.
Sec. 81. 1. The Legislative Auditor shall conduct an audit of
the Department of Motor Vehicles which measures the accuracy of
and the average time of completion for transactions related to the
issuance of certificates of registration, certificates of title, license
plates and permits authorized pursuant to NRS 482.396. The audit
must include such measures for all methods by which such
transactions are offered by the Department, including, without
limitation, transactions conducted in person at an office of the
Department or via a kiosk, the Internet website of the Department or
an agent of the Department authorized pursuant to NRS 482.160.
2. The Legislative Auditor shall present a final written report
of the audit to the Audit Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission not later than July 1, 2026.
Sec. 82. 1. This act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
2. Section 12 of this act expires by limitation on the date on
which the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 666 requiring each state to
establish procedures under which the state has authority to withhold
or suspend, or to restrict the use of professional, occupational and
recreational licenses of persons who:
(a) Have failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to
a proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish or
enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Are in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children,
 are repealed by the Congress of the United States.
H
-
*SB243*